Hadrian - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Early life 
2 Public service Toggle Public service subsection 
2.1 Relationship with Trajan and his family 
2.2 Succession 
3 Emperor 117 Toggle Emperor 117 subsection 
3.1 Securing power 
4 Travels Toggle Travels subsection 
4.1 Britannia and the West 122 
4.2 Africa Parthia 123 
4.3 Anatolia Antinous 123124 
4.4 Greece 124125 
4.5 Return to Italy and trip to Africa 126128 
4.6 Greece Asia and Egypt 128130 Antinouss death 
4.7 Greece and the East 130132 
4.8 Third RomanJewish War 132136 

4.8.1 Background causes 

4.8.2 Revolt 

4.8.3 Aftermath persecutions 

4.8.4 Hadrians itinerary 
5 Final years Toggle Final years subsection 
5.1 Arranging the succession 
5.2 Death 
6 Military activities 
7 Legal and social reforms 
8 Religious activities Toggle Religious activities subsection 
8.1 Antinous 
8.2 Christians 
9 Personal and cultural interests Toggle Personal and cultural interests subsection 
9.1 Poem by Hadrian 
10 Appraisals 
11 Hadrians Portraits 
12 Sources and historiography 
13 NervaAntonine family tree 
14 See also 
15 Citations 
16 References Toggle References subsection 
16.1 Primary sources 
16.2 Secondary sources 
17 Further reading 
18 External links Toggle the table of contents Hadrian 93 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch   Aragons Asturianu Azrbaycanca     Bnlmg   Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Frysk Gaeilge Galego Hakkng    Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia slenska Italiano    Kernowek Kiswahili Kongo Kurd  Latina Latvieu Ltzebuergesch Lietuvi Magyar  Malagasy      Bahasa Melayu Nederlands  Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha    Piemontis Polski Portugus Romn  Shqip Sicilianu Simple English Slovenina Slovenina    srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog  Trke   Ting Vit Winaray  Yorb  Zazaki  Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikiquote Wikisource From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Roman emperor from 117 to 138 This article is about the Roman emperor. For other uses see Hadrian disambiguation. Hadrian Bust of Hadrian c.130 Roman emperor Reign 11 August 117  10 July 138 Predecessor Trajan Successor Antoninus Pius Born Publius Aelius Hadrianus 24 January 76 Italica Hispania Baetica presentday Santiponce Spain Died 10 July 138 aged 62 Baiae Italia Burial Puteoli Gardens of Domitia Hadrians Mausoleum Spouse Vibia Sabina Adoptive children Lucius Aelius Caesar Antoninus Pius Regnal name Imperator Caesar Traianus Hadrianus Augustus1 Dynasty NervaAntonine Father Publius Aelius Hadrianus Afer Trajan adoptive Mother Domitia Paulina Religion Hellenistic religion Roman imperial dynasties Aureus of Hadrian NervaAntonine dynasty AD 96192 Chronology Nerva 9698 Trajan 98117 Hadrian 117138 Antoninus Pius 138161 Lucius Verus 161169 Marcus Aurelius 161180 Commodus 177192 Family NervaAntonine family tree CategoryNervaAntonine dynasty Succession Preceded by Flavian dynasty Followed by Year of the Five Emperors v t e Hadrian hedrin HAYdreen Latin Publius Aelius Hadrianus hadrijanus 24 January 76  10 July 138 was Roman emperor from 117 to 138. Hadrian was born in Italica close to modern Seville in Spain an Italic settlement in Hispania Baetica his branch of the Aelia gens the Aeli Hadriani came from the town of Hadria in eastern Italy. He was a member of the NervaAntonine dynasty. Early in his political career Hadrian married Vibia Sabina Trajans grandniece. The marriage and Hadrians later succession as emperor were probably promoted by Trajans wife Pompeia Plotina. Soon after his own succession Hadrian had four leading senators unlawfully put to death probably because they seemed to threaten the security of his reign this earned him the senates lifelong enmity. He earned further disapproval by abandoning Trajans expansionist policies and territorial gains in Mesopotamia Assyria Armenia and parts of Dacia. Hadrian preferred to invest in the development of stable defensible borders and the unification of the empires disparate peoples as subjects of a panhellenic empire led by Rome. Hadrian energetically pursued his own Imperial ideals and personal interests. He visited almost every province of the Empire and indulged a preference for direct intervention in imperial and provincial affairs especially building projects. He is particularly known for building Hadrians Wall which marked the northern limit of Britannia. In Rome itself he rebuilt the Pantheon and constructed the vast Temple of Venus and Roma. In Egypt he may have rebuilt the Serapeum of Alexandria. As an ardent admirer of Greek culture he promoted Athens as the cultural capital of the Empire. His intense relationship with Greek youth Antinous and the latters untimely death led Hadrian to establish a widespread popular cult. Late in Hadrians reign he suppressed the Bar Kokhba revolt he saw this rebellion as a failure of his panhellenic ideal. Hadrians last years were marred by chronic illness. His marriage had been both unhappy and childless. In 138 he adopted Antoninus Pius and nominated him as a successor on condition that Antoninus adopt Marcus Aurelius and Lucius Verus as his own heirs. Hadrian died the same year at Baiae and Antoninus had him deified despite opposition from the Senate. Later historians counted him as one of Romes socalled Five Good Emperors and as a benevolent dictator. His own Senate found him remote and authoritarian. He has been described as enigmatic and contradictory with a capacity for both great personal generosity and extreme cruelty and driven by insatiable curiosity conceit and ambition.2 Early lifeedit Hadrians Arch in central Athens Greece.3 Hadrians admiration for Greece materialised in such projects ordered during his reign. Publius Aelius Hadrianus was born on 24 January 76 in Italica modern Santiponce near Seville a Roman town founded by Italic settlers in the province of Hispania Baetica during the Second Punic War at the initiative of Scipio Africanus Hadrians branch of the gens Aelia came from Hadria modern Atri an ancient town in the Picenum region of Italia the source of the name Hadrianus. One Roman biographer claims instead that Hadrian was born in Rome but this view is held by a minority of scholars.456 Hadrians father was Publius Aelius Hadrianus Afer a senator of praetorian rank born and raised in Italica. Hadrians mother was Domitia Paulina daughter of a distinguished Roman senatorial family based in Gades Cdiz.7 His only sibling was an elder sister Aelia Domitia Paulina. His wet nurse was the slave Germana probably of Germanic origin to whom he was devoted throughout his life. She was later freed by him and ultimately outlived him as shown by her funerary inscription which was found at Hadrians Villa at Tivoli.8910 Hadrians greatnephew Gnaeus Pedanius Fuscus Salinator from Barcino Barcelona would become Hadrians colleague as coconsul in 118. As a senator Hadrians father would have spent much of his time in Rome.11 In terms of his later career Hadrians most significant family connection was to Trajan his fathers first cousin who was also of senatorial stock and a native of Italica. Although they were considered to be in the words of Aurelius Victor advenae aliens people from the outside both Trajan and Hadrian were of Italic lineage and belonged to the upper class of Roman society. One author has proposed to consider them part of the UlpioAelian dynasty.12 Hadrians parents died in 86 when he was ten years old. He and his sister became wards of Trajan and Publius Acilius Attianus who later became Trajans Praetorian prefect.7 Hadrian was physically active and enjoyed hunting when he was 14 Trajan called him to Rome and arranged his further education in subjects appropriate to a young Roman aristocrat.13 Hadrians enthusiasm for Greek literature and culture earned him the nickname Graeculus Greekling intended as a form of mild mockery.14 Public serviceedit Hadrians first official post in Rome was as a member of the decemviri stlitibus judicandis one among many vigintivirate offices at the lowest level of the cursus honorum course of honours that could lead to higher office and a senatorial career. He then served as a military tribune first with the Legio II Adiutrix in 95 then with the Legio V Macedonica. During Hadrians second stint as tribune the frail and aged reigning emperor Nerva adopted Trajan as his heir Hadrian was dispatched to give Trajan the news  or most probably was one of many emissaries charged with this same commission.15 Then Hadrian was transferred to Legio XXII Primigenia and a third tribunate.16 Hadrians three tribunates gave him some career advantage. Most scions of the older senatorial families might serve one or at most two military tribunates as a prerequisite to higher office.1718 When Nerva died in 98 Hadrian is said to have hastened to Trajan to inform him ahead of the official envoy sent by the governor Hadrians brotherinlaw and rival Lucius Julius Ursus Servianus.19 In 101 Hadrian was back in Rome he was elected quaestor then quaestor imperatoris Traiani liaison officer between Emperor and the assembled Senate to whom he read the Emperors communiqus and speeches  which he possibly composed on the emperors behalf. In his role as imperial ghostwriter Hadrian took the place of the recently deceased Licinius Sura Trajans allpowerful friend and kingmaker.20 His next post was as ab actis senatus keeping the Senates records.21 During the First Dacian War Hadrian took the field as a member of Trajans personal entourage but was excused from his military post to take office in Rome as tribune of the plebs in 105. After the war he was probably elected praetor.22 During the Second Dacian War Hadrian was in Trajans personal service again. He was released to serve as legate of Legio I Minervia then as governor of Lower Pannonia in 107 tasked with holding back the Sarmatians.2324 Between 107 and 108 Hadrian defeated an invasion of Romancontrolled Banat and Oltenia by the Iazyges. 252627 The exact terms of the peace treaty are not known. It is believed the Romans kept Oltenia in exchange for some form of concession likely involving a onetime tribute payment.26 The Iazyges also took possession of Banat around this time which may have been part of the treaty.28 Now in his midthirties Hadrian travelled to Greece he was granted Athenian citizenship and was appointed eponymous archon of Athens for a brief time in 1
12.2 9 The Athenians awarded him a statue with an inscription in the Theatre of Dionysus IG II2 3286 offering a detailed account of his cursus honorum thus far.3031 Thereafter no more is heard of him until Trajans Parthian campaign. It is possible that he remained in Greece until his recall to the imperial retinue23 when he joined Trajans expedition against Parthia as a legate.32 When the governor of Syria was sent to deal with renewed troubles in Dacia Hadrian was appointed his replacement with independent command.33 Trajan became seriously ill and took ship for Rome while Hadrian remained in Syria de facto general commander of the Eastern Roman army.34 Trajan got as far as the coastal city of Selinus in Cilicia and died there on 8 August 117 he would be regarded as one of Romes most admired popular and best emperors. Relationship with Trajan and his familyedit Around the time of his quaestorship in 100 or 101 Hadrian had married Trajans seventeen or eighteenyearold grandniece Vibia Sabina. Trajan himself seems to have been less than enthusiastic about the marriage and with good reason as the couples relationship would prove to be scandalously poor.35 The marriage might have been arranged by Trajans empress Plotina. This highly cultured influential woman shared many of Hadrians values and interests including the idea of the Roman Empire as a commonwealth with an underlying Hellenic culture.36 If Hadrian were to be appointed Trajans successor Plotina and her extended family could retain their social profile and political influence after Trajans death.37 Hadrian could also count on the support of his motherinlaw Salonia Matidia who was the daughter of Trajans beloved sister Ulpia Marciana.3839 When Ulpia Marciana died in 112 Trajan had her deified and made Salonia Matidia an Augusta.40 Bust of Emperor Trajan Muse SaintRaymond Toulouse Hadrians personal relationship with Trajan was complex and may have been difficult. Hadrian seems to have sought influence over Trajan or Trajans decisions through cultivation of the latters boy favourites this gave rise to some unexplained quarrel around the time of Hadrians marriage to Sabina.4142 Late in Trajans reign Hadrian failed to achieve a senior consulship being only suffect consul for 10843 this gave him parity of status with other members of the senatorial nobility44 but no particular distinction befitting an heir designate.45 Had Trajan wished it he could have promoted his protege to patrician rank and its privileges which included opportunities for a fast track to consulship without prior experience as tribune he chose not to.46 While Hadrian seems to have been granted the office of tribune of the plebs a year or so younger than was customary he had to leave Dacia and Trajan to take up the appointment Trajan might simply have wanted him out of the way.47 The Historia Augusta describes Trajans gift to Hadrian of a diamond ring that Trajan himself had received from Nerva which encouraged Hadrians hopes of succeeding to the throne.4849 While Trajan actively promoted Hadrians advancement he did so with caution.50 Successionedit Failure to nominate an heir could invite chaotic destructive wresting of power by a succession of competing claimants  a civil war. Too early a nomination could be seen as an abdication and reduce the chance for an orderly transmission of power.51 As Trajan lay dying nursed by his wife Plotina and closely watched by Prefect Attianus he could have lawfully adopted Hadrian as heir by means of a simple deathbed wish expressed before witnesses52 but when an adoption document was eventually presented it was signed not by Trajan but by Plotina.53 That Hadrian was still in Syria was a further irregularity as Roman adoption law required the presence of both parties at the adoption ceremony. Rumours doubts and speculation attended Hadrians adoption and succession. It has been suggested that Trajans young manservant Phaedimus who died very soon after Trajan was killed or killed himself rather than face awkward questions.54 Ancient sources are divided on the legitimacy of Hadrians adoption Dio Cassius saw it as bogus and the Historia Augusta writer as genuine.55 An aureus minted early in Hadrians reign represents the official position it presents Hadrian as Trajans Caesar Trajans heir designate.56 Emperor 1
17 edit Securing poweredit The Roman Empire in 125 under the rule of Hadrian According to the Historia Augusta Hadrian informed the Senate of his accession in a letter as a fait accompli explaining that the unseemly haste of the troops in acclaiming him emperor was due to the belief that the state could not be without an emperor.57 The new emperor rewarded the legions loyalty with the customary bonus and the Senate endorsed the acclamation. Various public ceremonies were organised on Hadrians behalf celebrating his divine election by all the gods whose community now included Trajan deified at Hadrians request.58 Hadrian remained in the east for a while suppressing the Jewish revolt that had broken out under Trajan. He relieved Judeas governor the outstanding Moorish general Lusius Quietus of his personal guard of Moorish auxiliaries5960 then he moved on to quell disturbances along the Danube frontier. In Rome Hadrians former guardian and current praetorian prefect Attianus claimed to have uncovered a conspiracy involving Lusius Quietus and three other leading senators Lucius Publilius Celsus Aulus Cornelius Palma Frontonianus and Gaius Avidius Nigrinus.61 There was no public trial for the four  they were tried in absentia hunted down and killed.61 Hadrian claimed that Attianus had acted on his own initiative and rewarded him with senatorial status and consular rank then pensioned him off no later than 1
20.6 2 Hadrian assured the senate that henceforth their ancient right to prosecute and judge their own would be respected. The reasons for these four executions remain obscure. Official recognition of Hadrian as a legitimate heir may have come too late to dissuade other potential claimants.63 Hadrians greatest rivals were Trajans closest friends the most experienced and senior members of the imperial council64 any of them might have been a legitimate competitor for the imperial office capaces imperii65 and any of them might have supported Trajans expansionist policies which Hadrian intended to change.66 One of their number was Aulus Cornelius Palma who as a former conqueror of Arabia Nabatea would have retained a stake in the East.67 The Historia Augusta describes Palma and a third executed senator Lucius Publilius Celsus consul for the second time in 113 as Hadrians personal enemies who had spoken in public against him.68 The fourth was Gaius Avidius Nigrinus an exconsul intellectual friend of Pliny the Younger and briefly Governor of Dacia at the start of Hadrians reign. He was probably Hadrians chief rival for the throne a senator of the highest rank breeding and connections according to the Historia Augusta Hadrian had considered making Nigrinus his heir apparent before deciding to get rid of him.6970 A denarius of Hadrian issued in 119 AD for his third consulship. Inscription HADRIANVS AVGVSTVS  LIBERALITAS AVG. CONS III P. P. Soon after in 125 Hadrian appointed Quintus Marcius Turbo as his Praetorian Prefect.71 Turbo was his close friend a leading figure of the equestrian order a senior court judge and a procurator.7273 As Hadrian also forbade equestrians to try cases against senators74 the Senate retained full legal authority over its members it also remained the highest court of appeal and formal appeals to the emperor regarding its decisions were forbidden.75 If this was an attempt to repair the damage done by Attianus with or without Hadrians full knowledge it was not enough Hadrians reputation and relationship with his Senate were irredeemably soured for the rest of his reign.76 Some sources describe Hadrians occasional recourse to a network of informers the frumentarii77 to discreetly investigate persons of high social standing including senators and his close friends.78 Travelsedit This statue of Hadrian in Greek dress was revealed in 2008 to have been forged in the Victorian era by cobbling together a head of Hadrian and an unknown body. For years the statue had been used by historians as proof of Hadrians love of Hellenic culture.79 British Museum London. Hadrian was to spend more than half his reign outside Italy. Whereas previous emperors had for the most part relied on the reports of their imperial representatives around the Empire Hadrian wished to see things for himself. Previous emperors had often left Rome for long periods but mostly to go to war returning once the conflict was settled. Hadrians nearincessant travels may represent a calculated break with traditions and attitudes in which the empire was a purely Roman hegemony. Hadrian sought to include provincials in a commonwealth of civilised peoples and a common Hellenic culture under Roman supervision.80 He supported the creation of provincial towns municipia semiautonomous urban communities with their own customs and laws rather than the imposition of new Roman colonies with Roman constitutions.81 A cosmopolitan ecumenical intent is evident in coin issues of Hadrians later reign showing the emperor raising up the personifications of various provinces.82 Aelius Aristides would later write that Hadrian extended over his subjects a protecting hand raising them as one helps fallen men on their feet.83 All this did not go well with Roman traditionalists. The selfindulgent emperor Nero had enjoyed a prolonged and peaceful tour of Greece and had been criticised by the Roman elite for abandoning his fundamental responsibilities as emperor. In the eastern provinces and to some extent in the west Nero had enjoyed popular support claims of his imminent return or rebirth emerged almost immediately after his death. Hadrian may have consciously exploited these positive popular connections during his own travels.84 In the Historia Augusta Hadrian is described as a little too much Greek too cosmopolitan for a Roman emperor.85 Britannia and the West 1
22 edit Main article Hadrians Wall Hadrians Wall the Roman frontier fortification in northern England. A milecastle is in the foreground. Prior to Hadrians arrival in Britannia the province had suffered a major rebellion from 119 to 1
21.8 6 Inscriptions tell of an expeditio Britannica that involved major troop movements including the dispatch of a detachment vexillatio comprising some 3000 soldiers. Fronto writes about military losses in Britannia at the time.87 Coin legends of 119120 attest that Quintus Pompeius Falco was sent to restore order. In 122 Hadrian initiated the construction of a wall to separate Romans from barbarians.88 The idea that the wall was built in order to deal with an actual threat or its resurgence however is probable but nevertheless conjectural.89 A general desire to cease the Empires extension may have been the determining motive. Reduction of defence costs may also have played a role as the Wall deterred attacks on Roman territory at a lower cost than a massed border army90 and controlled crossborder trade and immigration.91 A shrine was erected in York to Britannia as the divine personification of Britain coins were struck bearing her image identified as Britania.92 By the end of 122 Hadrian had concluded his visit to Britannia. He never saw the finished wall that bears his name. Hadrian appears to have continued through southern Gaul. At Nemausus he may have overseen the building of a basilica dedicated to his patroness Plotina who had recently died in Rome and had been deified at Hadrians request.93 At around this time Hadrian dismissed his secretary ab epistulis94 the biographer Suetonius for excessive familiarity towards the empress.95 Marcius Turbos colleague as praetorian prefect Gaius Septicius Clarus was dismissed for the same alleged reason perhaps a pretext to remove him from office.96 Hadrian spent the winter of 122123 at Tarraco in Spain where he restored the Temple of Augustus.97 Africa Parthia 1
23 edit In 123 Hadrian crossed the Mediterranean to Mauretania where he personally led a minor campaign against local rebels.98 The visit was cut short by reports of war preparations by Parthia Hadrian quickly headed eastwards. At some point he visited Cyrene where he personally funded the training of young men from wellbred families for the Roman military. Cyrene had benefited earlier in Hadrians reign in 119 from his restoration of public buildings destroyed during the earlier Trajanic Jewish revolt.99 Birley describes this kind of investment as characteristic of Hadrian100 Anatolia Antinous 1231
24 edit When Hadrian arrived on the Euphrates he personally negotiated a settlement with the Parthian King Osroes I inspected the Roman defences then set off westwards along the Black Sea coast.101 He probably wintered in Nicomedia the main city of Bithynia. Nicomedia had been hit by an earthquake only shortly before his stay Hadrian provided funds for its rebuilding and was acclaimed as restorer of the province.102 Bust of Antinous from Patras National Archaeological Museum Athens. It is possible that Hadrian visited Claudiopolis and saw the beautiful Antinous a young man of humble birth who became Hadrians lover. Literary and epigraphic sources say nothing of when or where they met depictions of Antinous show him aged 20 or so shortly before his death in 130. In 123 he would most likely have been a youth of 13 or 
14.1 02 It is also possible that Antinous was sent to Rome to be trained as a page to serve the emperor and only gradually rose to the status of imperial favourite.103 The actual historical detail of their relationship is mostly unknown.104 With or without Antinous Hadrian travelled through Anatolia. Various traditions suggest his presence at particular locations and allege his foundation of a city within Mysia Hadrianutherae after a successful boar hunt. At about this time plans to complete the Temple of Zeus in Cyzicus begun by the kings of Pergamon were put into practice. The temple received a colossal statue of Hadrian. Cyzicus Pergamon Smyrna Ephesus and Sardes were promoted as regional centres for the imperial cult neocoros.105 Greece 1241
25 edit Hadrian arrived in Greece during the autumn of 124 and participated in the Eleusinian Mysteries. He had a particular commitment to Athens which had previously granted him citizenship and an archonate106 at the Athenians request he revised their constitution  among other things he added a new phyle tribe which was named after him.107 Hadrian combined active handson interventions with cautious restraint. He refused to intervene in a local dispute between producers of olive oil and the Athenian Assembly and Council who had imposed production quotas on oil producers108 yet he granted an imperial subsidy for the Athenian grain supply.109 Hadrian created two foundations to fund Athens public games festivals and competitions if no citizen proved wealthy or willing enough to sponsor them as a Gymnasiarch or Agonothetes.110 Generally Hadrian preferred that Greek notables including priests of the imperial cult focus on more essential and durable provisions especially munera such as aqueducts and public fountains nymphaea.111 Athens was given two nymphaea one brought water from Mount Parnes to the Athenia Agora via a complex challenging and ambitious system of aqueduct tunnels and reservoirs to be constructed over several years.112 Several were given to Argos to remedy a watershortage so severe and so longstanding that thirsty Argos featured in Homeric epic.113 The Temple of Olympian Zeus Athens completed under Emperor Hadrian in 131. During that winter Hadrian toured the Peloponnese. His exact route is uncertain but it took in Epidaurus Pausanias describes temples built there by Hadrian and his statue  in heroic nudity  erected by its citizens114 in thanks to their restorer. Antinous and Hadrian may have already been lovers at this time Hadrian showed particular generosity to Mantinea which shared ancient mythic politically useful links with Antinous home at Bithynia. He restored Mantineas Temple of Poseidon Hippios115116 and according to Pausanias restored the citys original classical name. It had been renamed Antigoneia since Hellenistic times after the Macedonian King Antigonus III Doson. Hadrian also rebuilt the ancient shrines of Abae and Megara and the Heraion of Argos.117118 During his tour of the Peloponnese Hadrian persuaded the Spartan grandee Eurycles Herculanus  leader of the Euryclid family that had ruled Sparta since Augustus day  to enter the Senate alongside the Athenian grandee Herodes Atticus the Elder. The two aristocrats would be the first from Old Greece to enter the Roman Senate as representatives of Sparta and Athens traditional rivals and great powers of the Classical Age.119 This was an important step in overcoming Greek notables reluctance to take part in Roman political life.120 In March 125 Hadrian presided at the Athenian festival of Dionysia wearing Athenian dress. The Temple of Olympian Zeus had been under construction for more than five centuries Hadrian committed the vast resources at his command to ensure that the job would be finished.112 Return to Italy and trip to Africa 1261
28 edit Colossal portrait bust of the emperor Hadrian with a wreath of oak leaves AD 117138 Pentelic marble found in Athens National Archaeological Museum Athens Hadrian in armour wearing the gorgoneion on his breastplate marble Roman artwork c. 127128 AD from Heraklion Crete now in the Louvre Paris On his return to Italy Hadrian made a detour to Sicily. Coins celebrate him as the restorer of the island.121 Back in Rome he saw the rebuilt Pantheon and his completed villa at nearby Tibur among the Sabine Hills. In early March 127 Hadrian set off on a tour of Italy his route has been reconstructed through the evidence of his gifts and donations.121 He restored the shrine of Cupra in Cupra Maritima and improved the drainage of the Fucine lake. Less welcome than such largesse was his decision in 127 to divide Italy into four regions under imperial legates with consular rank acting as governors. They were given jurisdiction over all of Italy excluding Rome itself therefore shifting Italian cases from the courts of Rome.122 Having Italy effectively reduced to the status of a group of mere provinces did not go down well with the Roman Senate123 and the innovation did not long outlive Hadrians reign.121 Hadrian fell ill around this time whatever the nature of his illness it did not stop him from setting off in the spring of 128 to visit Africa. His arrival coincided with the good omen of rain which ended a drought. Along with his usual role as benefactor and restorer he found time to inspect the troops his speech to them survives.124 Hadrian returned to Italy in the summer of 128 but his stay was brief as he set off on another tour that would last three years.125 Greece Asia and Egypt 128130 Antinouss deathedit In September 128 Hadrian attended the Eleusinian Mysteries again. This time his visit to Greece seems to have concentrated on Athens and Sparta  the two ancient rivals for dominance of Greece. Hadrian had played with the idea of focusing his Greek revival around the Amphictyonic League based in Delphi but by now he had decided on something far grander. His new Panhellenion was going to be a council that would bring Greek cities together. Having set in motion the preparations  deciding whose claim to be a Greek city was genuine would take time  Hadrian set off for Ephesus.126 From Greece Hadrian proceeded by way of Asia to Egypt probably conveyed across the Aegean with his entourage by an Ephesian merchant Lucius Erastus. Hadrian later sent a letter to the Council of Ephesus supporting Erastus as a worthy candidate for town councillor and offering to pay the requisite fee.127 Gateway of Hadrianus in Philae Hadrian arrived in Egypt before the Egyptian New Year on 29 August 1
30.1 28 He opened his stay in Egypt by restoring Pompey the Greats tomb at Pelusium129 offering sacrifice to him as a hero and composing an epigraph for the tomb. As Pompey was universally acknowledged as responsible for establishing Romes power in the east this restoration was probably linked to a need to reaffirm Roman Eastern hegemony following social unrest there during Trajans late reign.130 Hadrian and Antinous held a lion hunt in the Libyan desert a poem on the subject by the Greek Pankrates is the earliest evidence that they travelled together.131 While Hadrian and his entourage were sailing on the Nile Antinous drowned. The exact circumstances surrounding his death are unknown and accident suicide murder and religious sacrifice have all been postulated. Historia Augusta offers the following account During a journey on the Nile he lost Antinous his favourite and for this youth he wept like a woman. Concerning this incident there are varying rumours for some claim that he had devoted himself to death for Hadrian and others  what both his beauty and Hadrians sensuality suggest. But however this may be the Greeks deified him at Hadrians request and declared that oracles were given through his agency but these it is commonly asserted were composed by Hadrian himself.132 Hadrian founded the city of Antinopolis in Antinous honour on 30 October 130. He then continued down the Nile to Thebes where his visit to the Colossi of Memnon on 20 and 21 November was commemorated by four epigrams inscribed by Julia Balbilla. After that he headed north reaching the Fayyum at the beginning of December.133 Greece and the East 1301
32 edit Arch of Hadrian in Jerash Transjordan built to honour Hadrians visit in 130 Hadrians movements after his journey down the Nile are uncertain. Whether or not he returned to Rome he travelled in the East during 130131 to organise and inaugurate his new Panhellenion which was to be focused on the Athenian Temple to Olympian Zeus. As local conflicts had led to the failure of the previous scheme for a Hellenic association centered on Delphi Hadrian decided instead for a grand league of all Greek cities.134 Successful applications for membership involved mythologised or fabricated claims to Greek origins and affirmations of loyalty to imperial Rome to satisfy Hadrians personal idealised notions of Hellenism.135136 Hadrian saw himself as protector of Greek culture and the liberties of Greece  in this case urban selfgovernment. It allowed Hadrian to appear as the fictive heir to Pericles who supposedly had convened a previous Panhellenic Congress  such a Congress is mentioned only in Pericles biography by Plutarch who respected Romes imperial order.137 Epigraphical evidence suggests that the prospect of applying to the Panhellenion held little attraction to the wealthier Hellenised cities of Asia Minor which were jealous of Athenian and European Greek preeminence within Hadrians scheme.138 Hadrians notion of Hellenism was narrow and deliberately archaising he defined Greekness in terms of classical roots rather than a broader Hellenistic culture.139 Some cities with a dubious claim to Greekness however  such as Side  were acknowledged as fully Hellenic.140 The German sociologist Georg Simmel remarked that the Panhellenion was based on games commemorations preservation of an ideal an entirely nonpolitical Hellenism.141 Hadrian bestowed honorific titles on many regional centres.142 Palmyra received a state visit and was given the civic name Hadriana Palmyra.143 Hadrian also bestowed honours on various Palmyrene magnates among them one Soados who had done much to protect Palmyrene trade between the Roman Empire and Parthia.144 Hadrian had spent the winter of 13132 in Athens where he dedicated the nowcompleted Temple of Olympian Zeus145 At some time in 132 he headed East to Judaea. Third RomanJewish War 1321
36 edit Main article Bar Kokhba revolt Coinage minted to mark Hadrians visit to Judea. Inscription HADRIANVS AVG. CONS. III P. P.  ADVENTVI arrival AVG. IVDAEAE  S. C. Statue of Hadrian unearthed at Tel Shalem commemorating Roman military victory over Simon bar Kokhba displayed at the Israel Museum Jerusalem Porphyry statue of Hadrian discovered in Caesarea Israel Background causesedit In Roman Judaea Hadrian visited Jerusalem which was still in ruins after the First RomanJewish War of 6673. He may have planned to rebuild Jerusalem as a Roman colony  as Vespasian had done with Caesarea Maritima  with various honorific and fiscal privileges. The nonRoman population would have no obligation to participate in Roman religious rituals but were expected to support the Roman imperial order this is attested in Caesarea where some Jews served in the Roman army during both the 66 and 132 rebellions.146 It has been speculated that Hadrian intended to assimilate the Jewish Temple to the traditional Roman civicreligious imperial cult such assimilations had long been commonplace practice in Greece and in other provinces and on the whole had been successful.147148 The neighbouring Samaritans had already integrated their religious rites with Hellenistic ones.149 Strict Jewish monotheism proved more resistant to imperial cajoling and then to imperial demands.150 A tradition based on the Historia Augusta suggests that the revolt was spurred by Hadrians abolition of circumcision brit milah151 which as a Hellenist he viewed as mutilation.152 The scholar Peter Schfer maintains that there is no evidence for this claim given the notoriously problematical nature of the Historia Augusta as a source the tomfoolery shown by the writer in the relevant passage and the fact that contemporary Roman legislation on genital mutilation seems to address the general issue of castration of slaves by their masters.153154155 Other issues could have contributed to the outbreak a heavyhanded culturally insensitive Roman administration tensions between the landless poor and incoming Roman colonists privileged with landgrants and a strong undercurrent of messianism predicated on Jeremiahs prophecy that the Temple would be rebuilt seventy years after its destruction as the First Temple had been after the Babylonian exile.156 Revoltedit A massive antiHellenistic and antiRoman Jewish uprising broke out led by Simon bar Kokhba.157 Given the fragmentary nature of the existing evidence it is impossible to ascertain an exact date for the beginning of the uprising. It probably began between summer and fall of 1
32.1 58 The Roman governor Tineius Tynius Rufus asked for an army to crush the resistance bar Kokhba punished any Jew who refused to join his ranks.157 According to Justin Martyr and Eusebius that had to do mostly with Christian converts who opposed bar Kokhbas messianic claims.159 The Romans were overwhelmed by the organised ferocity of the uprising.150 Hadrian called his general Sextus Julius Severus from Britain and brought troops in from as far as the Danube. Roman losses were heavy an entire legion or its numeric equivalent of around 40
00.1 60 Hadrians report on the war to the Roman Senate omitted the customary salutation If you and your children are in health it is well I and the legions are in health.161 The rebellion was quashed by 135. According to Cassius Dio.162 Beitar a fortified city 10 kilometres 
6.2  mi southwest of Jerusalem fell after a threeandahalfyear siege.163 Aftermath persecutionsedit Relief from an honorary monument of Hadrian detail showing the emperor being greeted by the goddess Roma and the Genii of the Senate and the Roman People marble Roman artwork 
2 nd century AD Capitoline Museums Vatican City Roman war operations in Judea left some 580000 Jews dead and 50 fortified towns and 985 villages razed.162 An unknown proportion of the population was enslaved. The extent of punitive measures against the Jewish population remains a matter of debate.163 Hadrian replaced the provinces name by renaming it Syria Palaestina. He renamed Jerusalem Aelia Capitolina after himself and Jupiter Capitolinus and had it rebuilt in Greek style. According to Epiphanius Hadrian appointed Aquila from Sinope in Pontus as overseer of the work of building the city since he was related to him by marriage.164 Hadrian is said to have placed the citys main Forum at the junction of the main Cardo and Decumanus Maximus now the location for the smaller Muristan. After the suppression of the Jewish revolt Hadrian provided the Samaritans with a temple dedicated to Zeus Hypsistos Highest Zeus165 on Mount Gerizim.166 The bloody repression of the revolt ended Jewish political independence from the Roman imperial order.167 Hadrians itineraryedit Inscriptions make it clear that in 133 Hadrian took to the field with his armies against the rebels. He then returned to Rome probably in that year and almost certainly  judging from inscriptions  via Illyricum.168 Final yearsedit imperial group as Mars and Venus the male figure is a portrait of Hadrian the female figure was perhaps reworked into a portrait of Annia Lucilla marble Roman artwork c. 120140 AD reworked c. 170175 AD. Hadrian spent the final years of his life in Rome. In 134 he took an imperial salutation for the end of the Third Jewish War which was not actually concluded until the following year. Commemorations and achievement awards were kept to a minimum as Hadrian came to see the war as a cruel and sudden disappointment to his aspirations towards a cosmopolitan empire.169 Empress Sabina died probably in 136 after an unhappy marriage with which Hadrian had coped as a political necessity. The Historia Augusta biography states that Hadrian himself declared that his wifes illtemper and irritability would be reason enough for a divorce were he a private citizen.170 That gave credence after Sabinas death to the common belief that Hadrian had her poisoned.171 In keeping with wellestablished imperial propriety Sabina  who had been made an Augusta sometime around 128172  was deified not long after her death.173 Arranging the successionedit Posthumous portrait of Hadrian bronze Roman artwork c. 140 AD perhaps from Roman Egypt Louvre Paris Hadrians marriage to Sabina had been childless. Suffering from poor health Hadrian turned to the issue of succession. In 136 he adopted one of the ordinary consuls of that year Lucius Ceionius Commodus who as an emperorinwaiting took the name Lucius Aelius Caesar. He was the soninlaw of Gaius Avidius Nigrinus one of the four consulars executed in 118. His health was delicate and his reputation apparently more that of a voluptuous welleducated great lord than that of a leader.174 Various modern attempts have been made to explain Hadrians choice Jerome Carcopino proposes that Aelius was Hadrians natural son.175 It has also been speculated that his adoption was Hadrians belated attempt to reconcile with one of the most important of the four senatorial families whose leading members had been executed soon after Hadrians succession.83 Aelius acquitted himself honourably as joint governor of Pannonia Superior and Pannonia Inferior176 he held a further consulship in 137 but died on 1 January 1
38.1 77 Hadrian next adopted Titus Aurelius Fulvus Boionius Arrius Antoninus the future emperor Antoninus Pius who had served Hadrian as one of the five imperial legates of Italy and as proconsul of Asia. In the interests of dynastic stability Hadrian required that Antoninus adopt both Lucius Ceionius Commodus son of the deceased Aelius Caesar and Marcus Annius Verus grandson of an influential senator of the same name who had been Hadrians close friend Annius was already betrothed to Aelius Caesars daughter Ceionia Fabia.178179 It may not have been Hadrian but rather Antoninus Pius  Annius Veruss uncle  who supported Annius Verus advancement the latters divorce of Ceionia Fabia and subsequent marriage to Antoninus daughter Annia Faustina points in the same direction. When he eventually became Emperor Marcus Aurelius would coopt Ceionius Commodus as his coEmperor under the name of Lucius Verus on his own initiative.178 Hadrians last few years were marked by conflict and unhappiness. His adoption of Aelius Caesar proved unpopular not least with Hadrians brotherinlaw Lucius Julius Ursus Servianus and Servianuss grandson Gnaeus Pedanius Fuscus Salinator. Servianus though now far too old had stood in the line of succession at the beginning of Hadrians reign Fuscus is said to have had designs on the imperial power for himself. In 137 he may have attempted a coup in which his grandfather was implicated Hadrian ordered that both be put to death.180 Servianus is reported to have prayed before his execution that Hadrian would long for death but be unable to die.181 During his final protracted illness Hadrian was prevented from suicide on several occasions.182 Deathedit Mausoleum of Hadrian commissioned by Hadrian as a mausoleum for himself and his family. Hadrian died in the year 138 on 10 July in his villa at Baiae at the age of 62 having reigned for 21 years.183 Dio Cassius and the Historia Augusta record details of his failing health some modern sources interpret the earcreases on later portrayals such as the Townley Hadrian as signs of coronary artery disease.184 He was buried at Puteoli near Baiae on an estate that had once belonged to Cicero. Soon after his remains were transferred to Rome and buried in the Gardens of Domitia close to the almostcomplete mausoleum. Upon completion of the Mausoleum of Hadrian in Rome in 139 by his successor Antoninus Pius his body was cremated. His ashes were placed there together with those of his wife Vibia Sabina and his first adopted son Lucius Aelius Caesar who also died in 138. The Senate had been reluctant to grant Hadrian divine honours but Antoninus persuaded them by threatening to refuse the position of Emperor.185186 Hadrian was given a temple on the Campus Martius ornamented with reliefs representing the provinces.187 The Senate awarded Antoninus the title of Pius in recognition of his filial piety in pressing for the deification of Hadrian his adoptive father.185 At the same time perhaps in reflection of the senates ill will towards Hadrian commemorative coinage honouring his deification was kept to a minimum.188 Military activitiesedit Statue of Hadrian in military garb wearing the civic crown and muscle cuirass from Antalya Turkey. Most of Hadrians military activities were consistent with his ideology of empire as a community of mutual interest and support. He focused on protection from external and internal threats on raising existing provinces rather than the aggressive acquisition of wealth and territory through subjugation of foreign peoples that had characterised the early empire.189 Hadrians policy shift was part of a trend towards the slowing down of the empires expansion such expansion being not closed after him the empires greatest extent being achieved only during the Severan dynasty but a significant step in that direction given the empires overstretching.190 While the empire as a whole benefited from this military careerists resented the loss of opportunities. The 
4 thcentury historian Aurelius Victor saw Hadrians withdrawal from Trajans territorial gains in Mesopotamia as a jealous belittlement of Trajans achievements Traiani gloriae invidens.191 More likely an expansionist policy was no longer sustainable the empire had lost two legions the Legio XXII Deiotariana and the lost legion IX Hispania possibly destroyed in a late Trajanic uprising by the Brigantes in Britain.192 Trajan himself may have thought his gains in Mesopotamia indefensible and abandoned them shortly before his death.193 Hadrian granted parts of Dacia to the Roxolani Sarmatians their king Rasparaganus received Roman citizenship client king status and possibly an increased subsidy.194 Hadrians presence on the Dacian front is mere conjecture but Dacia was included in his coin series with allegories of the provinces.195 A controlled partial withdrawal of troops from the Dacian plains would have been less costly than maintaining several Roman cavalry units and a supporting network of fortifications.196 Hadrian retained control over Osroene through the client king Parthamaspates who had once served as Trajans client king of Parthia197 and around 123 Hadrian negotiated a peace treaty with the nowindependent Parthia according to the Historia Augusta disputed.198 Late in his reign 135 the Alani attacked Roman Cappadocia with the covert support of Pharasmanes the king of Caucasian Iberia. The attack was repulsed by Hadrians governor the historian Arrian199 who subsequently installed a Roman adviser in Iberia.200 Arrian kept Hadrian wellinformed on matters related to the Black Sea and the Caucasus. Between 131 and 132 he sent Hadrian a lengthy letter Periplus of the Euxine on a maritime trip around the Black Sea that was intended to offer relevant information in case a Roman intervention was needed.201 Hadrian also developed permanent fortifications and military posts along the empires borders limites sl. limes to support his policy of stability peace and preparedness. That helped keep the military usefully occupied in times of peace his wall across Britania was built by ordinary troops. A series of mostly wooden fortifications forts outposts and watchtowers strengthened the Danube and Rhine borders. Troops practised intensive regular drill routines. Although his coins showed military images almost as often as peaceful ones Hadrians policy was peace through strength even threat202 with an emphasis on disciplina discipline which was the subject of two monetary series. Cassius Dio praised Hadrians emphasis on spit and polish as cause for the generally peaceful character of his reign.203 Fronto by contrast claimed that Hadrian preferred war games to actual war and enjoyed giving eloquent speeches to the armies  like the inscribed series of addresses he made while on an inspection tour during 128 at the new headquarters of Legio III Augusta in Lambaesis.204 Faced with a shortage of legionary recruits from Italy and other Romanised provinces Hadrian systematised the use of less costly numeri  ethnic noncitizen troops with special weapons such as Eastern mounted archers in lowintensity mobile defensive tasks such as dealing with border infiltrators and skirmishers.205206 Hadrian is also credited with introducing units of heavy cavalry cataphracts into the Roman army.207 Fronto later blamed Hadrian for declining standards in the Roman army of his own time.208 Legal and social reformsedit Bust of Emperor Hadrian Roman 117138 CE. Probably from Rome Italy. Formerly in the Townley Collection now housed in the British Museum London Hadrian enacted through the jurist Salvius Julianus the first attempt to codify Roman law. This was the Perpetual Edict according to which the legal actions of praetors became fixed statutes and as such could no longer be subjected to personal interpretation or change by any magistrate other than the Emperor.209210 At the same time following a procedure initiated by Domitian Hadrian made the Emperors legal advisory board the consilia principis council of the princeps into a permanent body staffed by salaried legal aides.211 Its members were mostly drawn from the equestrian class replacing the earlier freedmen of the imperial household.212213 This innovation marked the superseding of surviving Republican institutions by an openly autocratic political system.214 The reformed bureaucracy was supposed to exercise administrative functions independently of traditional magistracies objectively it did not detract from the Senates position. The new civil servants were free men and as such supposed to act on behalf of the interests of the Crown not of the Emperor as an individual.212 However the Senate never accepted the loss of its prestige caused by the emergence of a new aristocracy alongside it placing more strain on the already troubled relationship between the Senate and the Emperor.215 Hadrian codified the customary legal privileges of the wealthiest most influential higheststatus citizens described as splendidiores personae or honestiores who held a traditional right to pay fines when found guilty of relatively minor nontreasonous offences. Lowranking persons  alii the others including lowranking citizens  were humiliores who for the same offences could be subject to extreme physical punishments including forced labour in the mines or in public works as a form of fixedterm servitude. While Republican citizenship had carried at least notional equality under law and the right to justice offences in imperial courts were judged and punished according to the relative prestige rank reputation and moral worth of both parties senatorial courts were apt to be lenient when trying one of their peers and to deal very harshly with offences committed against one of their number by lowranking citizens or noncitizens. For treason maiestas beheading was the worst punishment that the law could inflict on honestiores the humiliores might suffer crucifixion burning or condemnation to the beasts in the arena.216 Bust of Hadrian from Athens c. 130 AD NAMA. A great number of Roman citizens maintained a precarious social and economic advantage at the lower end of the hierarchy. Hadrian found it necessary to clarify that decurions the usually middleclass elected local officials responsible for running the ordinary everyday official business of the provinces counted as honestiores so did soldiers veterans and their families as far as civil law was concerned by implication almost all citizens below those ranks  the vast majority of the Empires population  counted as humiliores with low citizen status high tax obligations and limited rights. Like most Romans Hadrian seems to have accepted slavery as morally correct an expression of the same natural order that rewarded the best men with wealth power and respect. When confronted by a crowd demanding the freeing of a popular slave charioteer Hadrian replied that he could not free a slave belonging to another person.217 However he limited the punishments that slaves could suffer they could be lawfully tortured to provide evidence but they could not be lawfully killed unless guilty of a capital offence.218 Masters were forbidden to sell slaves to a gladiator trainer lanista or to a procurer except as legally justified punishment.219 Hadrian also forbade torture of free defendants and witnesses.220221 He abolished ergastula private prisons for slaves in which kidnapped free men had sometimes been illegally detained.222 Hadrian issued a general rescript imposing a ban on castration performed on freedman or slave voluntarily or not on pain of death for both the performer and the patient.223 Under the Lex Cornelia de sicariis et veneficis castration was placed on a par with conspiracy to murder and punished accordingly.224 Notwithstanding his philhellenism Hadrian was also a traditionalist. He enforced dressstandards among the honestiores senators and knights were expected to wear the toga when in public. He imposed strict separation between the sexes in theatres and public baths to discourage idleness the latter were not allowed to open until 200 in the afternoon except for medical reasons.225 Religious activitiesedit Statue of Hadrian as pontifex maximus dated 130140 AD from Rome Palazzo Nuovo Capitoline Museums One of Hadrians immediate duties on accession was to seek senatorial consent for the deification of his predecessor Trajan and any members of Trajans family to whom he owed a debt of gratitude. Matidia Augusta Hadrians motherinlaw died in December 119 and was duly deified.226 Hadrian may have stopped at Nemausus during his return from Britannia to oversee the completion or foundation of a basilica dedicated to his patroness Plotina. She had recently died in Rome and had been deified at Hadrians request.93 As Emperor Hadrian was also Romes pontifex maximus responsible for all religious affairs and the proper functioning of official religious institutions throughout the empire. His HispanoRoman origins and marked proHellenism shifted the focus of the official imperial cult from Rome to the Provinces. While his standard coin issues identified him with the traditional genius populi Romani other issues stressed his personal identification with Hercules Gaditanus Hercules of Gades and Romes imperial protection of Greek civilisation.227 He promoted Sagalassos in Greek Pisidia as the Empires leading imperial cult centre his exclusively Greek Panhellenion extolled Athens as the spiritual centre of Greek culture.228 Hadrian added several imperial cult centres to the existing roster particularly in Greece where traditional intercity rivalries were commonplace. Cities promoted as imperial cult centres drew imperial sponsorship of festivals and sacred games and attracted tourism trade and private investment. Local worthies and sponsors were encouraged to seek selfpublicity as cult officials under the aegis of Roman rule and to foster reverence for imperial authority.229 Hadrians rebuilding of longestablished religious centres would have further underlined his respect for the glories of classical Greece  something well in line with contemporary antiquarian tastes.117230 During Hadrians third and last trip to the Greek East there seems to have been an upwelling of religious fervour focused on Hadrian himself. He was given personal cult as a deity monuments and civic homage according to the religious syncretism of the time.231 He may have had the great Serapeum of Alexandria rebuilt following damage sustained in 116 during the Kitos War.232 In 136 just two years before his death Hadrian dedicated his Temple of Venus and Roma. It was built on land he had set aside for the purpose in 121 formerly the site of Neros Golden House. The temple was the largest in Rome and was built in a Hellenising style more Greek than Roman. Its dedication and statuary associated the cultus of the traditional Roman goddess Venus divine ancestress and protector of the Roman people with the cultus of the goddess Roma  herself a Greek invention hitherto worshipped only in the provinces  to emphasise the universal nature of the empire.233 Antinousedit Busts of Hadrian and Antinous in the British Museum Hadrian had Antinous deified as OsirisAntinous by an Egyptian priest at the ancient Temple of Ramesses II very near the place of his death. Hadrian dedicated a new templecity complex there built in a GraecoRoman style and named it Antinopolis.234 It was a proper Greek polis it was granted an imperially subsidised alimentary scheme similar to Trajans alimenta235 and its citizens were allowed intermarriage with members of the native population without loss of citizen status. Hadrian thus identified an existing native cult to Osiris with Roman rule.236 The cult of Antinous was to become very popular in the Greekspeaking world and also found support in the West. In Hadrians villa statues of the Tyrannicides with a bearded Aristogeiton and a cleanshaven Harmodios linked his favourite to the classical tradition of Greek love.237 In the west Antinous was identified with the Celtic sun god Belenos.238 Hadrian was criticised for the open intensity of his grief at Antinouss death particularly as he had delayed the apotheosis of his own sister Paulina after her death.239 Nevertheless his recreation of the deceased youth as a cult figure found little opposition.240 Though not a subject of the statesponsored official Roman imperial cult Antinous offered a common focus for the emperor and his subjects emphasising their sense of community.241 Medals were struck with his effigy and statues were erected to him in all parts of the empire in all kinds of garb including Egyptian dress.242 Temples were built for his worship in Bithynia and Mantineia in Arcadia. In Athens festivals were celebrated in his honour and oracles delivered in his name. As an international cult figure Antinous had enduring fame far outlasting Hadrians reign.243 Local coins with his effigy were still being struck during Caracallas reign and he was invoked in a poem to celebrate the accession of Diocletian.244 Christiansedit Hadrian continued Trajans policy on Christians they should not be sought out and should only be prosecuted for specific offences such as refusal to swear oaths.245 In a rescript addressed to the proconsul of Asia Gaius Minicius Fundanus and preserved by Justin Martyr Hadrian laid down that accusers of Christians had to bear the burden of proof for their denunciations246 or be punished for calumnia defamation.247 Personal and cultural interestsedit Hadrian on the obverse of an aureus 123. The reverse bears a personification of Aequitas Augusti or Juno Moneta. Inscription IMP. CAESAR TRAIAN. HADRIANVS AVG.  P. M. TR. P. CONS. III. Hadrian had an abiding and enthusiastic interest in art architecture and public works. As part of his imperial restoration program he founded refounded or rebuilt many towns and cities throughout the Empire supplying them with temples stadiums and other public buildings. Examples in the Roman Province of Thrace include monumental developments to the Stadium and Odeon of Philippopolis presentday Plovdiv the provincial capital248 and his rebuilding and enlargement of the city of Orestias which he renamed Hadrianopolis modern Edirne.249 Several other towns and cities  including Roman Carthage  were named or renamed Hadrianopolis.250 Romes Pantheon temple to all the gods originally built by Agrippa and destroyed by fire in 80 was partly restored under Trajan and completed under Hadrian in its familiar domed form. Hadrians Villa at Tibur Tivoli provides the greatest Roman equivalent of an Alexandrian garden complete with domed Serapeum recreating a sacred landscape.251 An anecdote from Cassius Dios history suggests Hadrian had a high opinion of his own architectural tastes and talents and took their rejection as a personal offence at some time before his reign his predecessor Trajan was discussing an architectural problem with Apollodorus of Damascus  architect and designer of Trajans Forum the Column commemorating his Dacian conquest and his bridge across the Danube  when Hadrian interrupted to offer his advice. Apollodorus gave him a scathing response Be off and draw your gourds a sarcastic reference to the domes which Hadrian apparently liked to draw. You dont understand any of these matters. Dio claims that once Hadrian became emperor he showed Apollodorus drawings of the gigantic Temple of Venus and Roma implying that great buildings could be created without his help. When Apollodorus pointed out the buildings various insoluble problems and faults Hadrian was enraged sent him into exile and later put him to death on trumpedup charges.252253 Hadrian was a passionate hunter from a young age.254 In northwest Asia he founded and dedicated a city to commemorate a shebear he killed.255 In Egypt he and his beloved Antinous killed a lion. In Rome eight reliefs featuring Hadrian in different stages of hunting decorate a building that began as a monument celebrating a kill.255 Bust of the emperor Hadrian in the Capitoline Museums Hadrians philhellenism may have been one reason for his adoption like Nero before him of the beard as suited to Roman imperial dignity Dio of Prusa had equated the growth of the beard with the Hellenic ethos.256 Hadrians beard may also have served to conceal his natural facial blemishes.257 Before him all emperors except Nero who occasionally wore sideburns had been cleanshaven according to the fashion introduced among the Romans by Scipio Africanus 236  183 BCE all adult emperors after Hadrian were bearded until Constantine the Great r. 306  337 this imperial fashion was revived by Phocas r. 602  610 at the beginning of the 
7 th century.258259 Hadrian was familiar with the rival philosophers Epictetus and Favorinus and with their works and held an interest in Roman philosophy. During his first stay in Greece before he became emperor he attended lectures by Epictetus at Nicopolis.260 Shortly before the death of Plotina Hadrian had granted her wish that the leadership of the Epicurean School in Athens be open to a nonRoman candidate.261 During Hadrians time as tribune of the plebs omens and portents supposedly announced his future imperial condition.262 According to the Historia Augusta Hadrian had a great interest in astrology and divination and had been told of his future accession to the Empire by a granduncle who was himself a skilled astrologer.263 Hadrian wrote poetry in both Latin and Greek one of the few surviving examples is a Latin poem he reportedly composed on his deathbed see below. Some of his Greek productions found their way into the Palatine Anthology.264265 He also wrote an autobiography which Historia Augusta says was published under the name of Hadrians freedman Phlegon of Tralles. It was not a work of great length or revelation but designed to scotch various rumours or explain Hadrians most controversial actions.266 It is possible that this autobiography had the form of a series of open letters to Antoninus Pius.267 Poem by Hadrianedit According to the Historia Augusta Hadrian composed the following poem shortly before his death268 Animula vagula blandula Hospes comesque corporis Quae nunc abibis in loca Pallidula rigida nudula Nec ut soles dabis iocos... P. Aelius Hadrianus Imp. Roving amiable little soul Bodys companion and guest Now descending for parts Colourless unbending and bare Your usual distractions no more shall be there... The poem has enjoyed remarkable popularity269270 but uneven critical acclaim.271 According to Aelius Spartianus the alleged author of Hadrians biography in the Historia Augusta Hadrian wrote also similar poems in Greek not much better than this one.272 T. S. Eliots poem Animula may have been inspired by Hadrians though the relationship is not unambiguous.273 Appraisalsedit Bust of Emperor Hadrian Hadrian has been described as the most versatile of all Roman emperors who adroitly concealed a mind envious melancholy hedonistic and excessive with respect to his own ostentation he simulated restraint affability clemency and conversely disguised the ardor for fame with which he burned.274275 His successor Marcus Aurelius in his Meditations lists those to whom he owes a debt of gratitude Hadrian is conspicuously absent.276 Hadrians tense authoritarian relationship with his Senate was acknowledged a generation after his death by Fronto himself a senator who wrote in one of his letters to Marcus Aurelius that I praised the deified Hadrian your grandfather in the senate on a number of occasions with great enthusiasm and I did this willingly too ... But if it can be said  respectfully acknowledging your devotion towards your grandfather  I wanted to appease and assuage Hadrian as I would Mars Gradivus or Dis Pater rather than to love him.277 Fronto adds in another letter that he kept some friendships during Hadrians reign under the risk of my life cum periculo capitis.278 Hadrian underscored the autocratic character of his reign by counting his dies imperii from the day of his acclamation by the armies rather than the senate and legislating by frequent use of imperial decrees to bypass the need for the Senates approval.279 The veiled antagonism between Hadrian and the Senate never grew to overt confrontation as had happened during the reigns of overtly bad emperors because Hadrian knew how to remain aloof and avoid an open clash.280 That Hadrian spent half of his reign away from Rome in constant travel probably helped to mitigate the worst of this permanently strained relationship.281 Bust of Hadrian with an Antinousshaped gorgoneion 
2 nd century AD Museum of Astros Greece. In 1503 Niccol Machiavelli though an avowed republican esteemed Hadrian as an ideal princeps one of Romes Five Good Emperors. Friedrich Schiller called Hadrian the Empires first servant. Edward Gibbon admired his vast and active genius and his equity and moderation and considered Hadrians era as part of the happiest era of human history. In Ronald Symes view Hadrian was a Fhrer a Duce a Caudillo.282 According to Syme Tacitus description of the rise and accession of Tiberius is a disguised account of Hadrians authoritarian Principate.283 According again to Syme Tacitus Annals would be a work of contemporary history written during Hadrians reign and hating it.284 While the balance of ancient literary opinion almost invariably compares Hadrian unfavourably to his predecessor modern historians have sought to examine his motives purposes and the consequences of his actions and policies.285 For M.A. Levi a summingup of Hadrians policies should stress the ecumenical character of the Empire his development of an alternate bureaucracy disconnected from the Senate and adapted to the needs of an enlightened autocracy and his overall defensive strategy this would qualify him as a grand Roman political reformer creator of an openly absolute monarchy to replace a sham senatorial republic.286 Robin Lane Fox credits Hadrian as creator of a unified GrecoRoman cultural tradition and as the end of this same tradition Hadrians attempted restoration of Classical culture within a nondemocratic Empire drained it of substantive meaning or in Foxs words killed it with kindness.287 Hadrians Portraitsedit Hadrian Aureus with the portrait type DeltaOmikron Rome 1291
30 AD Hadrians portraiture shows him as the first Roman emperor with a beard. Most emperors after him followed his lead. 10 different portrait types are known of Hadrian. A juvenile type with curly hair broad side burns and a light moustache but a free chin was shown on coins later in his life on rare aurei but likely reflects an early portrait before he became emperor.288 His first portrait type as Caesar and Augustus used on coins in Mid 1
17 AD shows again broad sideburns merging into a strong moustache and still a free chin. The beard thus resembles beard styles popular in the 
19 th century like emperor Franz Josef of Austria. 289 Hadrian Portrait type I Rome denarius 1
17 AD This is then followed by portraits showing Hadrian with a short well groomed full beard until his death. Of note his portraits do not age during his reign.290 See other portrait images of Hadrian in this article for examples of the later Hadrian portraits. Sources and historiographyedit In Hadrians time there was already a wellestablished convention that one could not write a contemporary Roman imperial history for fear of contradicting what the emperors wanted to say read or hear about themselves.291292 As an earlier Latin source Frontos correspondence and works attest to Hadrians character and the internal politics of his rule.293 Greek authors such as Philostratus and Pausanias wrote shortly after Hadrians reign but confined their scope to the general historical framework that shaped Hadrians decisions especially those relating the Greekspeaking world Greek cities and notables.294 Pausanias especially wrote a lot in praise of Hadrians benefactions to Greece in general and Athens in particular.295 Political histories of Hadrians reign come mostly from later sources some of them written centuries after the reign itself. The early 
3 rdcentury Roman History by Cassius Dio written in Greek gave a general account of Hadrians reign but the original is lost and what survives aside from some fragments is a brief Byzantineera abridgment by the 
11 thcentury monk Xiphilinius who focused on Hadrians religious interests the Bar Kokhba war and little elsemostly on Hadrians moral qualities and his fraught relationship with the Senate.296 The principal source for Hadrians life and reign is therefore in Latin one of several late 
4 thcentury imperial biographies collectively known as the Historia Augusta. The collection as a whole is notorious for its unreliability a mish mash of actual fact cloak and dagger sword and sandal with a sprinkling of Ubu Roi297 but most modern historians consider its account of Hadrian to be relatively free of outright fictions and probably based on sound historical sources298 principally one of a lost series of imperial biographies by the prominent 
3 rdcentury senator Marius Maximus who covered the reigns of Nerva through to Elagabalus.299 The first modern historian to produce a chronological account of Hadrians life supplementing the written sources with other epigraphical numismatic and archaeological evidence was the German 
19 thcentury medievalist Ferdinand Gregorovius.300 A 1907 biography by Weber300 a German nationalist and later Nazi Party supporter incorporates the same archaeological evidence to produce an account of Hadrian and especially his Bar Kokhba war that has been described as ideologically loaded.301302303 Epigraphical studies in the postwar period help support alternate views of Hadrian. Anthony Birleys 1997 biography of Hadrian sums up and reflects these developments in Hadrian historiography. NervaAntonine family treeedit v t e NervaAntonine family tree Q. Marcius Barea Soranus Q. Marcius Barea Sura Antonia Furnilla M. Cocceius Nerva Sergia Plautilla P. Aelius Hadrianus Titus r.7981 Marcia Furnilla Marcia Trajanus Pater Nerva r.9698 Ulpiai Aelius Hadrianus Marullinus Flaviaii Marcianaiii C. Salonius Matidiusiv Trajan r.98117 Plotina P. Acilius Attianus P. Aelius Aferv Paulina Majorvi Lucius Mindius 2 Libo Rupilius Frugi 3 Salonia Matidiavii L. Vibius Sabinus 
1 viii Paulina Minorvi L. Julius Ursus Servianusix Matidia Minorvii Sabinaiii Hadrianvxvi r.117138 Antinousxi C. Fuscus Salinator I Julia Serviana Paulina M. Annius Verusxii Rupilia Faustinaxiiixiv Boionia Procilla Cn. Arrius Antoninus L. Ceionius Commodus Appia Severa C. Fuscus Salinator II L. Caesennius Paetus Arria Antonina Arria Fadillaxv T. Aurelius Fulvus L. Caesennius Antoninus L. Commodus Plautia unknownxvi C. Avidius Nigrinus M. Annius Verusxiii Calvisia Domitia Lucillaxvii Fundaniaxviii M. Annius Liboxiii Faustinaxv Antoninus Pius r.1381
61 xv L. Aelius Caesarxvi Avidiaxvi Cornificiaxiii Marcus Aurelius r.1611
80 xix Faustina Minorxix C. Avidius Cassiusxx Aurelia Fadillaxv Lucius Verus r.1611
69 xvi 1 Ceionia Fabiaxvi Plautius Quintillusxxi Q. Servilius Pudens Ceionia Plautiaxvi Cornificia Minorxxii M. Petronius Sura Commodus r.1771
92 xix Fadillaxxii M. Annius Verus Caesarxix Ti. Claudius Pompeianus 2 Lucillaxix M. Plautius Quintillusxvi Junius Licinius Balbus Servilia Ceionia Petronius Antoninus L. Aurelius Agaclytus 2 Aurelia Sabinaxxii L. Antistius Burrus 1 Plautius Quintillus Plautia Servilla C. Furius Sabinus Timesitheus Antonia Gordiana Junius Licinius Balbus Furia Sabina Tranquillina Gordian III r.238244 1  
1 st spouse 2  
2 nd spouse 3  
3 rd spouse Reddishpurple indicates emperor of the NervaAntonine dynasty lighter purple indicates designated imperial heir of said dynasty who never reigned grey indicates unsuccessful imperial aspirants bluishpurple indicates emperors of other dynasties dashed lines indicate adoption dotted lines indicate love affairsunmarried relationships Small Caps  posthumously deified Augusti Augustae or other Notes Except where otherwise noted the notes below indicate that an individuals parentage is as shown in the above family tree.  Sister of Trajans father Giacosa 1977 p. 7.  Giacosa 1977 p. 8.  a b Levick 2014 p. 161.  Husband of Ulpia Marciana Levick 2014 p. 161.  a b Giacosa 1977 p. 7.  a b c DIR contributor Herbert W. Benario 2000 Hadrian.  a b Giacosa 1977 p. 9.  Husband of Salonia Matidia Levick 2014 p. 161.  Smith 1870 Julius Servianus.  Smith 1870 Hadrian pp. 319322.  Lover of Hadrian Lambert 1984 p. 99 and passim deification Lamber 1984 pp. 25 etc.  Husband of Rupilia Faustina Levick 2014 p. 163.  a b c d Levick 2014 p. 163.  It is uncertain whether Rupilia Faustina was Frugis daughter by Salonia Matidia or another woman.  a b c d Levick 2014 p. 162.  a b c d e f g Levick 2014 p. 164.  Wife of M. Annius Verus Giacosa 1977 p. 10.  Wife of M. Annius Libo Levick 2014 p. 163.  a b c d e Giacosa 1977 p. 10.  The epitomator of Cassius Dio 
72.2 2 gives the story that Faustina the Elder promised to marry Avidius Cassius. This is also echoed in HA Marcus Aurelius 24.  Husband of Ceionia Fabia Levick 2014 p. 164.  a b c Levick 2014 p. 117. References DIR contributors 2000. De Imperatoribus Romanis An Online Encyclopedia of Roman Rulers and Their Families. Retrieved 14 April 2015. Giacosa Giorgio 1977. Women of the Caesars Their Lives and Portraits on Coins. Translated by R. Ross Holloway. Milan Edizioni Arte e Moneta. ISBN 0839001932. Lambert Royston 1984. Beloved and God The Story of Hadrian and Antinous. New York Viking. ISBN 0670157082. Levick Barbara 2014. Faustina I and II Imperial Women of the Golden Age. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780195379419. Smith William ed. 1870. Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology. See alsoedit Memoirs of Hadrian a 1951 semifictional autobiography of Hadrian written by Marguerite Yourcenar. Phallos a 2004 novella in which the narrator encounters Hadrian and Antinous just before Antinouss murder and then once more minutes afterward which changes the narrators life written by Samuel R. Delany. Hadrian a 2018 opera based on Hadrians life and death and his relationship with Antinous composed by Rufus Wainwright. Citationsedit  Salmon 333  Ando Clifford Hadrian The Restless Emperor by Anthony R. Birley Phoenix 52 1998 pp. 183185. JSTOR 1088268.  Kouremenos Anna 2022. The City of Hadrian and not of Theseus a cultural history of Hadrians Arch. Academia.edu.  Mary T. Boatwright 2008. From Domitian to Hadrian. In Barrett Anthony ed.. Lives of the Caesars. WileyBlackwell. p. 159. ISBN 9781405127554.  Alicia M. Canto Itlica sedes natalis de Adriano. 31 textos histricos y argumentos para una secular polmica Athenaeum XCII2 2004 367408.  Ronald Syme Hadrian and Italica Journal of Roman Studies LIV 1964 pp. 142149 supports the position that Rome was Hadrians birthplace. Canto argues that among the ancient sources only the Historia Augusta Vita Hadriani 24 claims this. 25 other sources including Hadrians horoscope state that he was born in Italica. See Stephan Heiler The Emperor Hadrian in the Horoscopes of Antigonus of Nicaea in Gnther Oestmann H. Darrel Rutkin Kocku von Stuckrad eds.Horoscopes and Public Spheres Essays on the History of Astrology Walter de Gruyter 2005 p. 49 ISBN 9783110185454 Cramer FH. Astrology in Roman Law and Politics Memoirs of the American Philosophical Society 37 Philadelphia 1954 reprinted 1996 162178 footnotes 1
21 b 122 et al.Googlebooks preview O. Neugebauer and H. B. Van Hoesen Greek Horoscopes Memoirs of the American Philosophical Society 48 76 Philadelphia 1959 pp. 8090 91 and footnote 19 googlebooks preview of 1987 edition  a b Royston Lambert Beloved And God pp. 3132.  CIL VI 10909 Text httpwww.edredr.itedrprogrammirescomplexcomune.phpdobookidnrEDR1314
20 partId1 on the Epigraphic Database Roma  Morwood 2013 pp. 5  43.  Opper 2008 p. 34.  On the numerous senatorial families from Spain residing at Rome and its vicinity around the time of Hadrians birth see R. Syme Spaniards at Tivoli in Roman Papers IV Oxford 1988 pp. 96114. Hadrian went on to build an Imperial villa at Tivoli Tibur  Alicia M. Canto La dinasta UlpioAelia 96192 d.C. ni tan Buenos ni tan Adoptivos ni tan Antoninos. Gerin 
21.1  263305. 2003  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 2426  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 1617  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor p. 37  John D. Grainger Nerva and the Roman Succession Crisis of AD 9699. Abingdon Routledge 2004 ISBN 0415349583 p. 109  Thorsten Opper The Emperor Hadrian. British Museum Press 2008 p.  39  Jrg Fndling Kommentar zur Vita Hadriani der Historia Augusta  Antiquitas. Reihe 4 Beitrge zur HistoriaAugustaForschung Serie 3 Kommentare Bnde 
4.1  und 
4.2 . Habelt Bonn 2006 ISBN 3774933901 p. 351.  John D. Grainger Nerva and the Roman Succession Crisis p. 109 Alan K. Bowman Peter Garnsey Dominic Rathbone eds. The Cambridge Ancient History  XI. Cambridge U. P. 2000 ISBN 0521263352 p. 133.  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor p. 54  Boatwright in Barrett p. 158  The text of Historia Augusta Vita Hadriani 
3.8  is garbled stating that Hadrians election to the praetorship was contemporary to the second consulate of Suburanus and Servianus  two characters that had nonsimultaneous second consulships  so Hadrians election could be dated to 102 or 104 the later date being the most accepted  a b Bowman p. 133  Anthony Everitt 2013 Chapter XI holding back the Sarmatians may simply have meant maintaining and patrolling the border.  Giurescu  FischerGalai 1998 p. 39.  a b Mcsy 2014 p. 94.  Brc 2013 p. 19.  Mcsy 2014 p. 101.  The inscription in footnote 1  The Athenian inscription confirms and expands the one in Historia Augusta see John Bodel ed. Epigraphic Evidence Ancient History From Inscriptions. Abingdon Routledge 2006 ISBN 0415116236 p. 89  His career in office up to 112113 is attested by the Athens inscription 112 AD CIL III 550  InscrAtt 3  IG II 3286  Dessau 308  IDRE 2 365 decemvir stlitibus iudicandis sevir turmae equitum Romanorum praefectus Urbi feriarum Latinarum tribunus militum legionis II Adiutricis Piae Fidelis 95 in Pannonia Inferior tribunus militum legionis V Macedonicae 96 in Moesia Inferior tribunus militum legionis XXII Primigeniae Piae Fidelis 97 in Germania Superior quaestor 101 ab actis senatus tribunus plebis 105 praetor 106 legatus legionis I Minerviae Piae Fidelis 106 in Germania Inferior legatus Augusti pro praetore Pannoniae Inferioris 107 consul suffectus 108 septemvir epulonum before 112 sodalis Augustalis before 112 archon Athenis 11213. He also held office as legatus Syriae 117 see H. W. Benario in Romanemperors.org Archived 8 April 2011 at the Wayback Machine  Anthony Birley Hadrian the Restless Emperor p. 68  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor p. 75  Karl Strobel Kaiser Traian. Eine Epoche der Weltgeschichte. Regensburg 2010 p. 401.  Robert H. Allen The Classical Origins of Modern Homophobia Jefferson Mcfarland 2006 ISBN 9780786423491 p. 120  Hidalgo de la Vega Maria Jos Plotina Sabina y Las Dos Faustinas La Funcin de Las Augustas en La Politica Imperial. Studia historica Historia antigua 18 2000 pp. 191224. Available at 1. Retrieved 11 January 2017  Plotina may have sought to avoid the fate of her contemporary former empress Domitia Longina who had fallen into social and political oblivion see Franois Chausson Varits Gnalogiques IVCohsion Collusions Collisions Une Autre Dynastie Antonine in Giorgio Bonamente Hartwin Brandt eds. Historiae Augustae Colloquium Bambergense. Bari Edipuglia 2007 ISBN 9788872284926 p. 143  Marasco p. 375  Tracy Jennings A Man Among Gods Evaluating the Significance of Hadrians Acts of Deification. Journal of Undergraduate Research 54. Available at 2 Archived 16 April 2017 at the Wayback Machine. Accessed 15 April 2017  This made Hadrian the first senator in history to have an Augusta as his motherinlaw something that his contemporaries could not fail to notice see Christer Brun Matidia die Jngere IN Anne Kolb ed. Augustae. Machtbewusste Frauen am rmischen Kaiserhof Herrschaftsstrukturen und Herrschaftspraxis II. Akten der Tagung in Zrich 
18.2 0. 9. 2008. Berlin Akademie Verlag 2010 ISBN 9783050048987 p. 230  Thorsten Opper Hadrian Empire and Conflict. Harvard University Press 2008 p. 170  David L. Balch Carolyn Osiek eds. Early Christian Families in Context An Interdisciplinary Dialogue. Grand Rapids Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing 2003 ISBN 0802839
86 X p. 301  Anthony R Birley Hadrian The Restless Emperor p. 54  Alan K. Bowman Peter Garnsey Dominic Rathbone eds. The Cambridge Ancient History XI p. 133  Mackay Christopher. Ancient Rome a Military and Political History. Cambridge U. Press 2007 ISBN 0521809185 p. 229  Fndling 335  Gabriele Marasco ed. Political Autobiographies and Memoirs in Antiquity A Brill Companion. Leiden Brill 2011 ISBN 9789004182998 p. 375  Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian 
3.7   In 23 BC Augustus handed a similar ring to his heir apparent Agrippa see Judith Lynn Sebesta Larissa Bonfante eds. The World of Roman Costume. University of Wisconsin Press 1994 p. 78  Fndling 351  Fndling 384 Strobel 401.  John Richardson The Roman Mind and the power of fiction IN Lewis Ayres Ian Gray Kidd eds. The Passionate Intellect Essays on the Transformation of Classical Traditions  Presented to Professor I.G. Kidd. New Brunswick Transaction Books 1995 ISBN 1560002107 p. 128  Birley Anthony Hadrian the restless emperor London  New York 1997 pp 
77 f based on Dio and the Historia Augusta Elizabeth Speller p. 25  Birley Restless Emperor p. 80  Stephan Brassloff Die Rechtsfrage bei der Adoption Hadrians. Hermes 49. Bd. H. 4 Sep. 1914 pp. 590601  The coin legend runs HADRIANO TRAIANO CAESARI see Burnett Andrew The early coinage of Hadrian and the deified Trajan at Rome and Alexandria American Journal of Numismatics 20 2008 pp 459477 see also Roman Yves Rmy Bernard  Riccardi Laurent Les intrigues de Plotine et la succession de Trajan.  propos dun aureus au nom dHadrien Csar. Rvue des tudes anciennes T. 111 2009 no. 2 pp. 508517 For the portrait type of Hadrian on his early coins of 1
17 AD with a partial beard showing his chin free of a beard see Pangerl Andreas Hadrians First and Second Imperial Portrait Types of 117118 AD Jahrbuch fr Numismatik und Geldgeschichte 71 2021 pp. 171184  Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian 
6.2   Egyptian papyri tell of one such ceremony between 117 and 118 see Michael Peppard The Son of God in the Roman World Divine Sonship in Its Social and Political Context. Oxford U. Press 2011 ISBN 9780199753703 pp. 
72 f  Royston Lambert p. 34  Cizek Eugen. Lloge de Caius Avidius Nigrinus chez Tacite et le  complot  des consulaires. In Bulletin de lAssociation Guillaume Bud no. 3 octobre 1980. pp. 276294. Retrieved 10 June 2015. Available at 3  a b Elizabeth Speller.  It is likely that Hadrian found Attianus ambition suspect. Attianus was likely dead or executed by the end of Hadrians reign see Franoise Des BoscsPlateaux Un parti hispanique  Rome ascension des lites hispaniques et pouvoir politique dAuguste  Hadrien 27 av. J.C.138 ap. J.C. Madrid Casa de Velzquez 2005 ISBN 8495555808 p. 611  Opper Hadrian Empire and Conflict 55  John Antony Crook Consilium Principis Imperial Councils and Counsellors from Augustus to Diocletian. Cambridge University Press 1955 pp. 
54 f  Marasco p. 377  Michel Christol  D. Nony Rome et son Empire. Paris Hachette 2003 ISBN 2011455421 p. 158  Hadrien Bru Le pouvoir imprial dans les provinces syriennes Reprsentations et clbrations dAuguste  Constantin. Leiden Brill 2011 ISBN 9789004203631 pp. 
46 f  Carcopino Jrme. Lhrdit dynastique chez les Antonins. Revue des tudes Anciennes. Tome 51 1949 no.34. pp. 262321.  Cizek Lloge de Caius Avidius Nigrinus  Nigrinus ambiguous relationship with Hadrian would have consequences late in Hadrians reign when he had to plan his own succession see Anthony Everitt Hadrian and the triumph of Rome. New York Random House 2009 ISBN 9781400066629.  Birley Restless Emperor p. 91  Christol  Nony p. 158  Richard P. Saller Personal Patronage Under the Early Empire. Cambridge University Press 2002 ISBN 0521233003 p. 140  Richard A. Bauman Crime and Punishment in Ancient Rome. London Routledge 2002 ISBN 0203428587 p. 83  Digest 49 2 I2 quoted by P.E. Corbett The Legislation of Hadrian. University of Pennsylvania Law Review and American Law Register Vol. 74 No. 8 Jun. 1926 pp. 753766  Birley Restless Emperor p. 88  Christopher J. Fuhrmann Policing the Roman Empire Soldiers Administration and Public Order. Oxford University Press 2012 ISBN 9780199737840 p. 153  Rose Mary Sheldon Intelligence Activities in Ancient Rome Trust in the Gods But Verify. London Routledge 2004 ISBN 0714654809 p. 253  Kennedy Maev 9 June 2008. How Victorian restorers faked the clothes that seemed to show Hadrians softer side. The Guardian. Retrieved 9 June 2008.  Paul Veyne Le Pain et le Cirque Paris Seuil 1976 ISBN 2020045079 p. 655  Andrs Mcsy Pannonia and Upper Moesia Routledge Revivals A History of the Middle Danube Provinces of the Roman Empire Routledge 2014 Hadrian  Paul Veyne  Humanitas Romans and nonRomans. In Andrea Giardina ed. The Romans University of Chicago Press 1993 ISBN 0226290492 p. 364  a b Christol  Nony p. 159  Larry Joseph Kreitzer Striking New Images Roman Imperial Coinage and the New Testament World. Sheffield A  C Black 1996 ISBN 1850756236 pp. 1
94 ff  Simon Goldhill Being Greek Under Rome Cultural Identity the Second Sophistic and the Development of Empire. Cambridge University Press 2006 p. 12 ISBN 0521663172  Birley Restless Emperor p. 123  Opper p. 79  Scriptores Historiae Augustae Hadrian xi 2  Nick Hodgson Hadrians Wall Archaeology and history at the limit of Romes empire. Ramsbury Crowood Press 2017 ISBN 9780719821592  Patrick le Roux Le hautEmpire romain en Occident dAuguste aux Svres. Paris Seuil 1998 ISBN 2020259
32 X p. 396  Breeze David J. and Brian Dobson Hadrians Wall Some Problems Britannia Vol. 3 1972 pp. 182208  Britannia on British Coins. Chard. Retrieved 25 June 2006.  a b Birley Restless Emperor p. 145  Potter David S. 2014. The Roman Empire at Bay AD 180395. Routledge. p. 77. ISBN 9781134694778.  Jason Knig Katerina Oikonomopoulou Greg Woolf eds. Ancient Libraries. Cambridge U. Press 2013 ISBN 9781107012561 p. 251  Anthony Everitt Hadrian and the triumph of Rome.  William E. Mierse Temples and Towns in Roman Iberia The Social and Architectural Dynamics of Sanctuary Designs from the Third Century B.C. to the Third Century A.D.. Berkeley University of California Press 2009 ISBN 0520203771 p. 141  Royston Lambert pp. 412  Anthony Birley pp. 1512 176180  The rebuilding continued until late in Hadrians reign in 138 a statue of Zeus was erected there dedicated to Hadrian as Cyrenes saviour and founder. See E. Mary Smallwood The Jews Under Roman Rule from Pompey to Diocletian  a Study in Political Relations. Leiden Brill 2001 0391041
55 X p. 410  Anthony Birley pp. 1535  a b Anthony Birley pp. 1578  Royston Lambert pp. 601  Opper Hadrian Empire and Conflict p. 171  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 1647  Anna Kouremenos 2022. The Province of Achaea in the 
2 nd century CE The Past Present. London Routledge ISBN 1032014857  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 1757  Kaja HarterUibopuu Hadrian and the Athenian Oil Law in O.M. Van Nijf  R. Alston ed. Feeding the Ancient Greek city. Groningen Royal Holloway Studies on the Greek City after the Classical Age vol. 1 Louvain 2008 pp. 127141  Brenda Longfellow Roman Imperialism and Civic Patronage Form Meaning and Ideology in Monumental Fountain Complexes. Cambridge U. Press 2011 ISBN 9780521194938 p. 120  Verhoogen Violette. Review of Graindor Paul. Athnes sous Hadrien Revue belge de philologie et dhistoire 1935 vol. 14 no. 3 pp. 926931. Available at 4. Retrieved 20 June 2015  Mark Golden Greek Sport and Social Status University of Texas Press 2009 ISBN 9780292718692 p. 88  a b Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 1824  Cynthia Kosso Anne Scott eds. The Nature and Function of Water Baths Bathing and Hygiene from Antiquity Through the Renaissance. Leiden Brill 2009 ISBN 9789004173576 pp. 2
16 f  Alexia PetsalisDiomidis Truly Beyond Wonders Aelius Aristides and the Cult of Asklepios. OUP  2010 ISBN 9780199561902 p. 171  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 17780  David S. PotterThe Roman Empire at Bay AD 180395. London Routledge 2014 ISBN 9780415840545 p. 44  a b Boatwright p. 134  K. W. Arafat Pausanias Greece Ancient Artists and Roman Rulers. Cambridge U. Press 2004 ISBN 0521553407 pp. 162 185  Birley Hadrian and Greek Senators Zeitschrift fr Papyrologie und Epigraphik 116 1997 pp. 209245. Retrieved 23 July 2015  Christol  Nony p. 203  a b c Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 191200  J. Declareuil Rome the LawGiver London Routledge 2013 ISBN 0415156130 p. 72  Clifford Ando Imperial Ideology and Provincial Loyalty in the Roman Empire. Berkeley University of California Press 2000 ISBN 9780520220676  Royston Lambert pp. 712  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 2134  Anthony Birley Restless Emperor pp. 21520  Boatwright p. 81  Foertmeyer Victoria Anne 1989. Tourism in GraecoRoman Egypt PhD. Princeton. pp. 107108.  Birley Restless Emperor p. 235  Boatwright p. 142  Opper Hadrian Empire and Conflict p. 173  Historia Augusta c. 395 Hadr. 
14.5 7  Foertmeyer pp. 107108  Cortes Copete Juan Manuel. El fracaso del primer proyecto panhelnico de Adriano.Dialogues dhistoire ancienne vol. 25 n2 1999. pp. 91112. Available at 5 Archived 3 June 2018 at the Wayback Machine. Retrieved 3 January 2019  Boatwright p. 150  Anthony Kaldellis Hellenism in Byzantium The Transformations of Greek Identity and the Reception of the Classical Tradition. Cambridge University Press 2008 ISBN 9780521876889 p. 38  Fernando A. Marn Valds Plutarco y el arte de la Atenas hegemnica. Universidad de Oviedo 2008 ISBN 9788483176597 p. 76  A. J. S. Spawforth Greece and the Augustan Cultural Revolution. Cambridge University Press 2011 ISBN 9781107012110 p. 262  Nathanael J. Andrade Syrian Identity in the GrecoRoman World. Cambridge University Press 2013 ISBN 9781107012059 p. 176  Domingo Plcido ed. La construccin ideolgica de la ciudadana identidades culturales y sociedad en el mundo griego antiguo. Madrid Editorial Complutense 2006 ISBN 8474917905 p. 462  Georg Simmel Sociology Inquiries into the Construction of Social Forms. Leiden Brill 2009 ISBN 9789004173217 p. 288  Nathanael J. Andrade Syrian Identity in the GrecoRoman World Cambridge University Press 2013 ISBN 9781107012059 p. 177  Andrew M. Smith II Roman Palmyra Identity Community and State Formation. Oxford University Press 2013 ISBN 9780199861101 p. 25 Robert K. Sherk The Roman Empire Augustus to Hadrian. Cambridge University Press 1988 ISBN 0521338875 p. 190  Hadrien Bru Le pouvoir imprial dans les provinces syriennes Reprsentations et clbrations dAuguste  Constantin 31 av. J.C.337 ap. J.C.. Leiden Brill 2011 ISBN 9789004203631 pp. 104105  Laura Salah Nasrallah Christian Responses to Roman Art and Architecture The SecondCentury Church Amid the Spaces of Empire. Cambridge University Press 2010 ISBN 9780521766524 p. 96  Giovanni Battista Bazzana The Bar Kokhba Revolt and Hadrians religious policy IN Marco Rizzi ed. Hadrian and the Christians. Berlim De Gruyter 2010 ISBN 9783110224702 pp. 8991  Bazzana 98  Cf a project devised earlier by Hellenized Jewish intellectuals such as Philo see Rizzi Hadrian and the Christians 4  Emmanuel Friedheim Some notes about the Samaritans and the Rabbinic Class at Crossroads. In Menachem Mor Friedrich V. Reiterer eds. Samaritans  Past and Present Current Studies. Berlin De Gruyter 2010 ISBN 9783110194975 p. 197.  a b Peter Schfer 1981 Der Bar KokhbaAufstand in German Tbingen pp. 2950.  Schfer Peter 1998. Judeophobia Attitudes Toward the Jews in the Ancient World. Harvard University Press. pp. 103105. ISBN 9780674043213. Retrieved 1 February 2014. ... Hadrians ban on circumcision allegedly imposed sometime between 128 and 132 CE .... The only proof for Hadrians ban on circumcision is the short note in the Historia Augusta At this time also the Jews began war because they were forbidden to mutilate their genitals quot vetabantur mutilare genitalia. ... The historical credibility of this remark is controversial ... The earliest evidence for circumcision in Roman legislation is an edict by Antoninus Pius 138161 CE Hadrians successor ... It is not utterly impossible that Hadrian ... indeed considered circumcision as a barbarous mutilation and tried to prohibit it. ... However this proposal cannot be more than a conjecture and of course it does not solve the questions of when Hadrian issued the decree before or duringafter the Bar Kokhba war and whether it was directed solely against Jews or also against other peoples.  Mackay Christopher. Ancient Rome a Military and Political History 230  Peter Schfer 2003 The Bar Kokhba War Reconsidered New Perspectives on the Second Jewish Revolt Against Rome Mohr Siebeck p. 68.  Peter Schfer 2003 The History of the Jews in the GrecoRoman World The Jews of Palestine from Alexander the Great to the Arab Conquest. Routledge p. 146.  Historia Augusta Hadrian 
14.2 .  Shaye Cohen 2013 From the Maccabees to the Mishnah 
3 rd edition. Louisville KY Westminster John Knox Press pp. 2526 ISBN 9780664239046.  a b Chronicle of Jerome s.v. Hadrian. See 6 See also Yigael Yadin 1971 BarKokhba New York Random House pp. 22 258.  Steven T. Katz ed 1984. The Cambridge History of Judaism Volume 4 The Late RomanRabbinic Period. Cambridge University Press pp. 11112 ISBN 9780521772488.  Alexander Zephyr 2013 Rabbi Akiva Bar Kokhba Revolt and the Ten Tribes of Israel. Bloomington iUniverse ISBN 9781491712566.  Possibly the XXII Deiotariana which according to epigraphy did not outlast Hadrians reign see livius.org account Archived 17 March 2015 at the Wayback Machine however Peter Schfer following Bowersock finds no traces in the written sources of the purported annihilation of Legio XXII. A loss of such magnitude would have surely been mentioned Der Bar KokhbaAufstand 14.  Cassius Dio 69 
14.3  Roman History. Many Romans moreover perished in this war. Therefore Hadrian in writing to the Senate did not employ the opening phrase commonly affected by the emperors...  a b Dios Roman History trans. Earnest Cary vol. 8 books 6170 London Loeb Classical Library 1925 pp. 449451.  a b Daniel R. Schwartz Zeev Weiss eds. 2011 Was 70 CE a Watershed in Jewish History On Jews and Judaism before and after the Destruction of the Second Temple. Leiden Brill ISBN 9789004215344 p. 529 footnote 42.  Epiphanius On Weights and Measures 14 Hadrians Journey to the East and the Rebuilding of Jerusalem Renan Baker Zeitschrift fr Papyrologie und Epigraphik Bd. 182 2012 pp. 157167. Published by Rudolf Habelt GmbH available through JSTOR subscription required accessed 25 March 2012.  Ken Dowden Zeus. Abingdon Routledge 2006 ISBN 0415305020 p. 58.  Anna Collar 2013 Religious Networks in the Roman Empire. Cambridge University Press pp. 248249 ISBN 9781107043442.  Geza Vermes 2006 Whos Who in the Age of Jesus entry Hadrian Penguin ISBN 0140515658.  Ronald Syme 1988 Journeys of Hadrian pp. 1649.  Ronald Syme Journeys Of Hadrian. Zeitschrift fr Papyrologie und Epigraphik 73 1988 159170. Available at 7. Retrieved 20 January 2017.  Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian 
10.3   Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian 
23.9   Anne Kolb Augustae. Machtbewusste Frauen am rmischen Kaiserhof Herrschaftsstrukturen und Herrschaftspraxis II. Akten der Tagung in Zrich 
18.2 0. 9. 2008. Berlin Akademie Verlag 2010 ISBN 9783050048987 pp. 2627  Olivier Hekster Emperors and Ancestors Roman Rulers and the Constraints of Tradition. Oxford U. Press 2015 ISBN 9780198736820 pp. 140142  Merlin Alfred. Passion et politique chez les Csars review of Jrme Carcopino Passion et politique chez les Csars. In Journal des savants. Jan.Mar. 1958. pp. 518. Available at 8. Retrieved 12 June 2015.  Albino Garzetti From Tiberius to the Antonines  A History of the Roman Empire AD 14192. London Routledge 2014 p. 699  Andrs Mcsy Pannonia and Upper Moesia Routledge Revivals A History of the Middle Danube Provinces of the Roman Empire. London Routledge 2014 ISBN 9780415745826 p. 102  Anthony Birley pp. 289292.  a b The adoptions Anthony Birley pp. 2945 T.D. Barnes Hadrian and Lucius Verus Journal of Roman Studies 1967 Ronald Syme Tacitus p. 601. Antoninus as a legate of Italy Anthony Birley p. 199  Annius Verus was also the stepgrandson of the Prefect of Rome Lucius Catilius Severus one of the remnants of the allpowerful group of Spanish senators from Trajans reign. Hadrian would likely have shown some favour to the grandson in order to count on the grandfathers support for an account of the various familial and marital alliances involved see Des BoscsPlateaux pp. 241 311 477 577 see also Frank McLynnMarcus Aurelius A Life. New York Da Capo 2010 ISBN 9780306819162 p. 84  Anthony Birley pp. 2912  Dio 
69.1 
7.2   Anthony Birley p. 297  Anthony Birley p. 300  Cruse Audrey 22 December 2009. The Emperor Hadrian fl. AD 117138 and Medicine. Journal of Medical Biography. 17 4 241243. doi
10.1 2
58 jmb.20
09.0 09057. ISSN 09677720. PMID 20029087. S
2 CID 33084298.  a b Salmon 816  Dio 

70.1.1   Samuel Ball Platner A Topographical Dictionary of Ancient Rome. Cambridge University Press 2015 ISBN 9781108083249 p. 250  Christian Bechtold Gott und Gestirn als Prsenzformen des toten Kaisers Apotheose und Katasterismos in der politischen Kommunikation der rmischen Kaiserzeit und ihre Anknpfungspunkte im Hellenismus.VR unipress GmbH 2011 ISBN 9783899716856 p. 259  Clifford Ando Imperial Ideology and Provincial Loyalty in the Roman Empire. Berkeley University of California Press 2000 ISBN 0520220676 p. 330  Patrick Le Roux Le Haut Empire Romain en Occident dAuguste aux Svres. Paris Seuil 1998 ISBN 2020259
32 X p. 56  W. Den Boer Some Minor Roman Historians Leiden Brill 1972 ISBN 9004035451 p. 41  Yann Le Bohec The Imperial Roman Army. London Routledge 2013 ISBN 0415222958 p. 55  Albino Garzetti From Tiberius to the Antonines Routledge Revivals A History of the Roman Empire AD 14192. London Routledge 2014 ISBN 9781138019201 p. 381  The partial withdrawal was probably supervised by the governor of Moesia Quintus Pompeius Falco see Birley Restless Emperor pp. 84 86.  Eutropiuss notion that Hadrian contemplated withdrawing from Dacia altogether appears to be unfounded see Jocelyn M. C. Toynbee The Hadrianic School A Chapter in the History of Greek Art. CUP Archive 1934 79  Julian Bennett TrajanOptimus Priceps. Bloomington Indiana University Press 2001 ISBN 0253214351 p. 165  Opper Empire and Conflict p. 67  Doleal Stanislav 2017. Did Hadrian Ever Meet a Parthian King. AUC Philologica. 2017 2 111125. doi
10.1 4712246468
30.2 0
17.1 6. ISSN 24646830.  N. J. E. Austin  N. B. Rankov Exploratio Military  Political Intelligence in the Roman World from the Second Punic War to the Battle of Adrianople. London Routledge 2002 p. 4  Austin  Rankov p. 30  Fergus Millar Rome the Greek World and the East Volume 2 Government Society and Culture in the Roman Empire. The University of North Carolina Press 2005 ISBN 0807828521 p. 183  Elizabeth Speller p. 69  Opper p. 85  Birley Restless Emperor pp. 209212  Luttvak Edward N. The Grand Strategy of the Roman Empire From the First Century A.D. to the Third Baltimore Johns Hopkins University Press 1979 ISBN 0801821584 p. 123  Christol  Nony p. 180  Baumer Christoph 11 December 2012. The History of Central Asia The Age of the Steppe Warriors Google Knihy. Bloomsbury Academic. ISBN 9781780760605. Retrieved 3 September 2016.  Fronto Selected Letters. Edited by Caillan Davenport  Jenifer Manley London AC  Black 2014 ISBN 9781780934426 pp. 1
84 f  Laura Jansen The Roman Paratext Frame Texts Readers Cambridge University Press 2014 ISBN 9781107024366 p. 66  Kathleen Kuiper Editor Ancient Rome From Romulus and Remus to the Visigoth Invasion New York Britannica Educational Publishing 2010 ISBN 9781615302079 p. 133  A. Arthur Schiller Roman Law Mechanisms of Development Walter de Gruyter 1978 ISBN 9027977445 p. 471  a b Salmon 812  R.V. Nind Hopkins Life of Alexander Severus CUP Archive p. 110  Adolf Berger Encyclopedic Dictionary of Roman Law Volume 43 Philadelphia American Philosophical Society 1968 ISBN 0871694352 p. 650  Salmon 813  Garnsey Peter Legal Privilege in the Roman Empire Past  Present No. 41 Dec. 1968 pp. 9 13 note 35 16 published by Oxford University Press on behalf of The Past and Present Society JSTOR 650001  Westermann 109  Marcel Morabito Les Ralits de lesclavage daprs Le Digeste. Paris Presses Univ. FrancheC omt 1981 ISBN 9782251602547 p. 230  Donald G. Kyle Spectacles of Death in Ancient Rome. London Routledge 2012 ISBN 04150967
82 William Linn Westermann The Slave Systems of Greek and Roman Antiquity. Philadelphia American Philosophical Society 1955 p. 115  Digest 
48.1 
8.2 1 quoted by Q.F. Robinson Penal Practice and Penal Policy in Ancient Rome. Abingdon Routledge 2007 ISBN 9780415416511 p. 107  Judith Perkins Roman Imperial Identities in the Early Christian Era. Abingdon Routledge 2009 ISBN 9780415397445  Christopher J. Fuhrmann Policing the Roman Empire Soldiers Administration and Public Order. Oxford University Press 2012 ISBN 9780199737840 p. 102  Digest 

48.8.4 .2 quoted by Paul Du Plessis Borkowskis Textbook on Roman Law. Oxford University Press 2015 ISBN 9780199574889 p. 95  Peter Schfer Judeophobia 104.  Garzetti p. 411  Birley Restless Emperor p. 107  Gradel Ittai Emperor Worship and Roman Religion Oxford Oxford University Press 2002. ISBN 0198152752 pp. 1945.  Howgego in Howgego C. Heuchert V. Burnett A. eds Coinage and Identity in the Roman Provinces Oxford University Press 2005. ISBN 9780199265268 pp. 6 10.  Boatwright p. 136  K. W. Arafat Pausanias Greece Ancient Artists and Roman Rulers. Cambridge U. Press 2004 ISBN 0521553407 p. 162  Marcel Le Glay. Hadrien et lAsklpieion de Pergame. In Bulletin de correspondance hellnique. Volume 100 livraison 1 1976. pp. 347372. Available at 9. Retrieved 24 July 2015.  Alan Rowe B. R. Rees 1956. A Contribution To The Archaeology of The Western Desert IV  The Great Serapeum Of Alexandria PDF. Manchester.  Mellor R. The Goddess Roma in Haase W. Temporini H. eds Aufstieg und Niedergang der romischen Welt de Gruyter 1991 ISBN 3110103893 pp. 960964  Cassius Dio LIX.11 Historia Augusta Hadrian  Tim Cornell Kathryn Lomas eds. Bread and Circuses Euergetism and Municipal Patronage in Roman Italy. London Routledge 2003 ISBN 0415146895 p. 97  Carl F. Petry ed. The Cambridge History of Egypt Volume 1. Cambridge University Press 2008 ISBN 9780521471374 p. 15  Elsner Js Imperial Rome and Christian Triumph Oxford History of Art Oxford U.P. 1998 ISBN 0192842013 p. 1
76 f.  Williams p. 61  Hadrians Hellenic emotionalism finds a culturally sympathetic echo in the Homeric Achilles mourning for his friend Patroclus see discussion in Vout Caroline Power and eroticism in Imperial Rome illustrated Cambridge University Press 2007. ISBN 0521867398 pp. 52135.  Craig A. Williams Roman Homosexuality  Ideologies of Masculinity in Classical Antiquity. Oxford University Press 1999 ISBN 9780195113006 pp. 
60 f  Marco Rizzi p. 12  Elsner Imperial Rome p. 1
83 f.  see Trevor W. Thompson Antinoos The New God Origen on Miracle and Belief in Third Century Egypt for the persistence of Antinouss cult and Christian reactions to it. Freely available. The relationship of P. Oxy. 
63.4 352 with Diocletians accession is not entirely clear.  Caroline Vout Power and Eroticism in Imperial Rome. Cambridge University Press 2007 p. 89  Birley Restless Emperor pp. 127 183.  Alessandro Galimberti Hadrian Eleusis and the beginnings of Christian apologetics in Marco Rizzi ed. Hadrian and the Christians. Berlim De Gruyter 2010 ISBN 9783110224702 pp. 
77 f  Robert M. Haddad The Case for Christianity St. Justin Martyrs Arguments for Religious Liberty and Judicial Justice. Plymouth Rowman  Littlefield 2010 ISBN 9781589795754 p. 16  MartinovaKjutova Maya Project BG0041 The Ancient Stadium of Philippopolis  Preservation Rehabilitation and Urban Renewal Regional Administration Plovdiv 20112023 accessed 14 December 2023 10  Edirne  Turkey  Britannica. 7 March 2024.  Birley Restless Emperor pp. 176180  It was lost in large part to despoliation by the Cardinal dEste who had much of the marble removed to build the Villa dEste in the 
16 th century.  Brickstamps with consular dates show that the Pantheons dome was late in Trajans reign 115 probably under Apollodoruss supervision see Ilan VitSuzan Architectural Heritage Revisited A Holistic Engagement of its Tangible and Intangible Constituents  Farnham Ashgate 2014 ISBN 9781472420626 p. 20  Cassius Dio  Epitome of Book69. penelope.uchicago.edu.  Historia Augusta Hadrian 
2.1 .  a b Fox Robin The Classical World An Epic History from Homer to Hadrian Basic Books. 2006 p. 574  Birley Restless Emperor p. 62  The Historia Augusta however claims that he wore a full beard to cover up the natural blemishes on his face H.A. 
26.1   Papathanassiou Manolis. Byzantine first  last times.  . Byzantium.xronikon.com. Retrieved 7 November 2012.  Barba  NumisWiki The Collaborative Numismatics Project. Forumancientcoins.com. Retrieved 7 November 2012.  Robin Lane Fox The Classical World An Epic History from Homer to Hadrian. Philadelphia Basic Books 2006 ISBN 9780465024971 p. 578  Birley Restless Emperor pp. 1
08 f  For instance a probably bogus anecdote in Historia Augusta relates that as tribune he had lost a cloak that emperors never wore Michael Reiche ed. Antike Autobiographien Werke Epochen Gattungen. Kln Bhlau 2005 ISBN 3412105058 p. 225  Christiane L. JoostGaugier Measuring Heaven Pythagoras and His Influence on Thought and Art in Antiquity and the Middle Ages. Cornell University Press 2007 ISBN 9780801443961 p. 177  Juan Gil  Sofa Torallas Tovar Hadrianus. Barcelona CSIC 2010 ISBN 9788400091934 p. 100  Direct links to Hadrians poems in the A.P. with W.R. Patons translation at the Internet Archive VI 332 VII 674 IX 137 IX 387  T. J. Cornell ed. The Fragments of the Roman Historians. Oxford University Press 2013 p. 591  Opper Hadrian Empire and Conflict p. 26  Historia Augusta Hadrian Dio 
25.9  Antony Birley p. 301  see e.g.Fortythree translations of Hadrians Animula vagula blandula ... including translations by Henry Vaughan A. Pope Lord Byron.  A.A. Barb Animula Vagula Blandula Folklore 61 1950  ... since Casaubon almost three and a half centuries of classical scholars have admired this poem  see Note 2 in Emanuela Andreoni Fontecedros JSTOR 20547373 Animula vagula blandula Adriano debitore di Plutarco Quaderni Urbinati di Cultura Classica 1997  tales autem nec multo meliores fecit et Graecos Historia Augusta ibidem  Russell E. Murphy Critical Companion to T. S. Eliot A Literary Reference to His Life and Work 2007. p. 48  Varius multiplex multiformis in the anonymous ancient Epitome de Caesaribus 
14.6  trans. Thomas M. Banchich Canisius College Buffalo New York 2009 Archived 8 November 2020 at the Wayback Machine Retrieved 24 March 2018  cf Ronald Syme among others see Ando footnote 172  McLynn 42  Wytse Keulen Eloquence rules the ambiguous image of Hadrian in Frontos correspondence. 11 Retrieved 20 February 2015  James Uden 2010. The Contest of Homer and Hesiod and the ambitions of Hadrian. Journal of Hellenic Studies 130 2010 pp. 1211
35.1 2. Accessed 16 October 2017  Edward Togo SalmonA History of the Roman World from 30 B.C. to A.D. 138. London Routledge 2004 ISBN 0415045045 pp. 3
14 f  Paul Veyne LEmpire GrcoRomain p. 40  Birley Restless Emperor p. 1  See also Paul Veyne LEmpire GrcoRomain p. 65  Victoria Emma Pagn A Companion to Tacitus. Malden MA John Wiley  Sons 2012 ISBN 9781405190329 p. 1  Marache R. R. Syme Tacitus 1958. In Revue des tudes Anciennes. Tome 61 1959 n12. pp. 202206.available at 13. Accessed 30 April 2017  Susanne Mortensen Hadrian. Eine Deutungsgeschichte. Habelt Bonn 2004 ISBN 3774932298  Franco Sartori Loecumnisme dun empereur souvent mconnu  review of M.A. Levi Adriano un ventennio di cambiamento. In Dialogues dhistoire ancienne vol. 21 no. 1 1995. pp. 290297. Available at 14. Retrieved 19 January 2017  The Classical World An Epic History from Homer to Hadrian. New York Basic Books 2006 ISBN 9780465024971 p. 4  Strack PL Untersuchungen zur Rmischen Reichsprgung des zweiten Jahrhunderts  Teil 2 Die Reichsprgung zur Zeit des Hadrian Stuttgart 1933 also Abdy RA and Mittag PF Roman Imperial Coinage RIC Volume II Part 3 From AD 117 to AD 138  Hadrian London 2019  Pangerl Andreas Hadrians First and Second Imperial Portrait Types of 117118 AD Jahrbuch fr Numismatik und Geldgeschichte 71 2021 pp 171184  Wegner Max Hadrian Das Rmische Herrscherbild Berlin 1956 and Evers Cecile Les Portraits dHadrien typologie et ateliers Bruxelles 1994  Steven H. Rutledge Writing Imperial Politics The Social and Political Background IN William J. Dominik ed Writing Politics in Imperial Rome Brill 2009 ISBN 9789004156715 p. 60  Adam M. Kemezis Lucian Fronto and the absence of contemporary historiography under the Antonines. The American Journal of Philology Vol. 131 No. 2 Summer 2010 pp. 285325  Mary Taliaferro Boatwright Hadrian and the Cities of the Roman Empire. Princeton University Press 2002 pp. 2026  Birley Restless Emperor 160  K.W. Arafat Pausanias Greece Ancient Artists and Roman Rulers. Cambridge University Press2004 ISBN 0521553407 p. 171.  Boatwright 20  Paul Veyne LEmpire GrcoRomain. Paris Seuil 2005 ISBN 2020577984 p. 312. In the French original de lAlexandre Dumas du pplum et un peu dUbu Roi.  Danel den Hengst Emperors and Historiography Collected Essays on the Literature of the Roman Empire. Leiden Brill 2010 ISBN 9789004174382 p. 93.  Alan K. Bowman Peter Garnsey Dominic Rathbone eds. The Cambridge Ancient History XI the High Empire 70192 A.D.Cambridge University Press 2000 ISBN 9780521263351 p. 132.  a b Anthony R Birley Hadrian The Restless Emperor. Abingdon Routledge 2013 ISBN 0415165
44 X p. 7.  Thomas E. Jenkins Antiquity Now The Classical World in the Contemporary American Imagination. Cambridge University Press 2015 ISBN 9780521196260 p. 121.  Aharon Oppenheimer Between Rome and Babylon Studies in Jewish Leadership and Society.Tbingen Mohr Siebeck 2005 ISBN 3161485149 p. 199.  Birley Hadrian the Restless Emperor 7 Birley describes the results of Ernst Kornemanns attempt to sift the Historia Augusta biographys facts from its fictions through textual analysis alone as doubtful. B.W. Hendersons 1923 English language biography of Hadrian focuses on ancient written sources and largely ignores or overlooks the published archaeological epigraphic and nonliterary evidence used by Weber. Referencesedit Primary sourcesedit Cassius Dio or Dio Cassius Roman History. Greek Text and Translation by Earnest Cary at internet archive Scriptores Historiae Augustae Augustan History. Latin Text Translated by David Magie Aurelius Victor Caesares XIV. Latin Caesares text  IntraText CT. Intratext.com. 4 May 2007. Retrieved 13 March 2010. Anon Excerpta of Aurelius Victor Epitome de Caesaribus XIII. Latin Epitome De Caesaribus text  IntraText CT. Intratext.com. 4 May 2007. Retrieved 13 March 2010. Inscriptions Eusebius of Caesarea Church History Book IV Church History. New Advent. Retrieved 13 March 2010. Smallwood E.M Documents Illustrating the Principates of Nerva Trajan and Hadrian Cambridge 1966. Secondary sourcesedit Brc Vitalie 2013. Nomads of the Steppes on the Danube Frontier of the Roman Empire in the 
1 st Century CE. Historical Sketch and Chronological Remarks. Dacia. OCLC 1023761641. Barnes T. D. 1967. Hadrian and Lucius Verus. Journal of Roman Studies. 57 12 6579. doi
10.2 307299345. JSTOR 299345. S
2 CID 162678629. Birley Anthony R. 1997. Hadrian. The restless emperor. London Routledge. ISBN 9780415165440. Boatwright Mary Taliaferro 1987. Hadrian and the city of Rome. Princeton N.J. Princeton University Press. ISBN 9780691002187. Boatwright Mary Taliaferro. 2002. Hadrian and the Cities of the Roman Empire. Princeton Princeton University Press. ISBN 9780691048895. Canto Alicia M. 2004. Itlica patria y ciudad natal de Adriano 31 textos histricos y argumentos contra Vita Hadr. 1 3. Athenaeum. 92 2 367408. Archived from the original on 15 October 2007. Everitt Anthony 2009. Hadrian and the Triumph of Rome. New York Random House. ISBN 9781400066629. Dobson Brian 2000. Hadrians Wall. London Penguin. Gibbon Edward The Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire vol. I 1776. The Online Library of Liberty Online Library of Liberty  The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire vol. 1. Oll.libertyfund.org. Archived from the original on 7 August 2010. Retrieved 13 March 2010. Giurescu Dinu C. FischerGalai Stephen A. 1998. Romania a Historic Perspective. East European Monographs. OCLC 39317152. Lambert Royston 1997. Beloved and God the story of Hadrian and Antinous. London Phoenix Giants. ISBN 9781857999440. Mcsy Andrs 2014. Pannonia and Upper Moesia Routledge Revivals A History of the Middle Danube Provinces of the Roman Empire. Routledge. ISBN 9781317754251. Morwood James 2013. Hadrian. London New York Bloomsbury Academic. ISBN 9781849668866. Opper Thorsten 2008. Hadrian Empire and Conflict. Cambridge Mass. Harvard University Press. ISBN 9780674030954. Speller Elizabeth 2003. Following Hadrian a secondcentury journey through the Roman Empire. London Review. ISBN 9780747266624. Syme Ronald 1997 1958. Tacitus. Oxford Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780198143277. Syme Ronald 1964. Hadrian and Italica. Journal of Roman Studies. LIV 12 14249. doi
10.2 307298660. JSTOR 298660. S
2 CID 162241585. Syme Ronald 1988. Journeys of Hadrian PDF. Zeitschrift fr Papyrologie und Epigraphik. 73 159170. Retrieved 12 December 2006. Reprinted in Syme Ronald 1991. Roman Papers VI. Oxford Clarendon Press. pp. 34657. ISBN 9780198144946. Further readingedit Danziger Danny Purcell Nicholas 2006. Hadrians empire  when Rome ruled the world. London Hodder  Stoughton. ISBN 9780340833612. Everitt Anthony 2009. Hadrian and the triumph of Rome. New York Random House. ISBN 9781400066629. Gray William Dodge 1919. A Study of the life of Hadrian Prior to His Accession. Smith College Studies in History. 4 151209. Gregorovius Ferdinand 1898. The Emperor Hadrian A Picture of the GrecoRoman World in His Time. Mary E. Robinson trans. London Macmillan. ISBN 9780790552286. Henderson Bernard W. 1923. Life and Principate of the Emperor Hadrian. London Methuen. IshKishor Sulamith 1935. Magnificent Hadrian A Biography of Hadrian Emperor of Rome. New York Minton Balch and Co. Kouremenos Anna 2022. The Province of Achaea in the 
2 nd century CE The Past Present. Routledge. ISBN 9781032014852 Perowne Stewart 1960. Hadrian. London Hodder and Stoughton. Modena Altieri Ascanio 2017. Imago roboris Adriano di Tel Shalem. Rome LIntellettuale Dissidente. Archived from the original on 31 May 2021. Retrieved 25 March 2021. External linksedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to Publius Aelius Traianus Hadrianus. Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian Hadrian coinage Catholic Encyclopedia article Major scultoric find at Sagalassos Turkey 2 August 2007 between 13 and 16 feet in height four to five meters with some splendid photos courtesy of the Sagalassos Archaeological Research Project Hadrian in De Imperatoribus Romanis Online Encyclopedia of Roman Emperors Archived 8 April 2011 at the Wayback Machine Hadrian NervanAntonine dynasty Born 24 January AD 76 Died 10 July AD 138 Regnal titles Preceded by Trajan Roman emperor 117138 Succeeded by Antoninus Pius Political offices Preceded by Ap. Annius Trebonius Gallus and M. Appius Bradua as Ordinary consuls Roman suffect consul 108 with M. Trebatius Priscus Succeeded by Quintus Pompeius Falco and M. Titius Lustricus Bruttianus as Suffect consuls Preceded by ignotus and Gn. Minicius Faustinus as Suffect consuls Roman consul 118 with Gn. Pedanius Fuscus Salinator JanFeb Bellicius Tebanianus March G. Ummidius Quadratus May Succeeded by L. Pomponius Bassus and T. Sabinius Barbarus as Suffect consuls Preceded by L. Pomponius Bassus and T. Sabinius Barbarus as Suffect consuls Roman consul 119 with Publius Dasumius Rusticus JanFeb Aulus Platorius Nepos MarchApril Succeeded by M. Paccius Silvanus Q. Coredius Gallus Gargilius Antiquus and Q. Vibius Gallus as Suffect consuls v t e Roman and Byzantine emperors and empresses regnant Principate 27 BC  AD 235 Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Marcus Aurelius Lucius Verus Commodus Pertinax Didius Julianus Septimius Severus Caracalla Geta Macrinus w. Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Crisis 235285 Maximinus I Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip I w. Philip II Decius w. Herennius Etruscus Trebonianus Gallus w. Hostilian  Volusianus Aemilianus Silbannacus  Valerian Gallienus w. Saloninus Claudius II Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Florianus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Dominate 284610 Diocletian Maximian Galerius Constantius I Severus II Constantine I Maxentius Licinius Maximinus II Valerius Valens Martinian Constantine II Constantius II Constans I Magnentius Nepotianus Vetranio Julian Jovian Valentinian I Valens Procopius Gratian Theodosius I Valentinian II Magnus Maximus w. Victor Eugenius Western Empire 395480 Honorius Constantine III w. Constans II Priscus Attalus Constantius III Joannes Valentinian III Petronius Maximus Avitus Majorian Severus III Anthemius Olybrius Glycerius Julius Nepos Romulus Augustulus Eastern Empire 395610 Arcadius Theodosius II Marcian Leo I Leo II Zeno Basiliscus w. Marcus Anastasius I Justin I Justinian I Justin II Tiberius II Constantine Maurice w. Theodosius Phocas Eastern Byzantine Empire 6101453 Heraclius Constantine III Heraclonas w. Tiberius Constans II Constantine IV w. Heraclius  Tiberius Justinian II Leontius Tiberius III Justinian II w. Tiberius Philippicus Anastasius II Theodosius III Leo III Constantine V Artabasdos w. Nikephoros Leo IV Constantine VI Irene Nikephoros I Staurakios Michael I Rangabe w. Theophylact  Staurakios Leo V w. Constantine Michael II Theophilos w. Constantine Theodora II w. Thekla Michael III Basil I w. Constantine Leo VI Alexander Constantine VII Romanos I Lekapenos w. Christopher Stephen  Constantine Lekapenos Romanos II Nikephoros II Phokas John I Tzimiskes Basil II Constantine VIII Zoe Romanos III Argyros Michael IV Michael V Constantine IX Monomachos Theodora III Michael VI Bringas Isaac I Komnenos Constantine X Doukas Eudokia Makrembolitissa Romanos IV Diogenes w. Leo  Nikephoros Michael VII Doukas w. Andronikos Konstantios  Constantine Doukas Nikephoros III Botaneiates Alexios I Komnenos w. Constantine Doukas John II Komnenos w. Alexios Manuel I Komnenos Alexios II Komnenos Andronikos I Komnenos w. John Isaac II Angelos Alexios III Angelos Alexios IV Angelos Alexios V Doukas Theodore I Laskaris w. Nicholas John III Vatatzes Theodore II Laskaris John IV Laskaris Michael VIII Palaiologos Andronikos II Palaiologos Michael IX Palaiologos Andronikos III Palaiologos John V Palaiologos John VI Kantakouzenos w. Matthew Andronikos IV Palaiologos John VII Palaiologos w. Andronikos V Manuel II Palaiologos John VIII Palaiologos Constantine XI Palaiologos See also Gallic emperors 260274 Palmyrene emperors 267273 Britannic emperors 286296 Trapezuntine emperors 12041461 Thessalonian emperors 12241242 Empresses Augustae Usurpers Classical Eastern Italics indicates a junior coemperor underlining indicates an emperor variously regarded as either legitimate or a usurper v t e Pharaohs Protodynastic to First Intermediate Period 31502040 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Protodynastic pre3150 BC Lower Hedju Hor NyHor NiNeith HatHor Pu Hsekiu Khayu Tiu Thesh Neheb Wazner Mekh A Double Falcon Wash Upper A Finger Snail Fish PenAbu Stork Bull Scorpion I Shendjw IryHor Ka Scorpion II Narmer  Menes Early Dynastic 31502686 BC I Narmer  Menes HorAha Djer Djet Den Anedjib Semerkhet Qaa Sneferka Horus Bird II Hotepsekhemwy Nebra Nynetjer Ba Nubnefer Horus Sa WenegNebty Wadjenes Senedj SethPeribsen SekhemibPerenmaat Neferkara I Neferkasokar Hudjefa I Khasekhemwy Old Kingdom 26862181 BC III Djoser Sekhemkhet Sanakht Nebka Khaba Sedjes Qahedjet Huni IV Snefru Khufu Djedefre Khafre Bikheris Menkaure Shepseskaf Thamphthis V Userkaf Sahure Neferirkare Kakai Neferefre Shepseskare Nyuserre Ini Menkauhor Kaiu Djedkare Isesi Unas VI Teti Userkare Pepi I Merenre Nemtyemsaf I Pepi II Merenre Nemtyemsaf II Netjerkare Siptah Neferka Nefer 
1 st Intermediate 21812040 BC VIIVIII Menkare Neferkare II Neferkare III Neby Djedkare Shemai Neferkare IV Khendu Merenhor Neferkamin Nikare Neferkare V Tereru Neferkahor Neferkare VI Pepiseneb Neferkamin Anu Qakare Iby Neferkaure Neferkauhor Neferirkare Wadjkare Khuiqer Khui Iytjenu IX Meryibre Khety Neferkare VII Nebkaure Khety Setut Imhotep X Meryhathor Neferkare VIII Wahkare Khety Merykare Middle Kingdom and Second Intermediate Period 20401550 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Middle Kingdom 20401802 BC XI Mentuhotep I Intef I Intef II Intef III Mentuhotep II Mentuhotep III Mentuhotep IV Nubia Segerseni Qakare Ini Iyibkhentre XII Amenemhat I Senusret I Amenemhat II Senusret II Senusret III Amenemhat III Amenemhat IV Sobekneferu Seankhibtawy Seankhibra 
2 nd Intermediate 18021550 BC XIII Sekhemrekhutawy Sobekhotep Sonbef Nerikare Sekhemkare Amenemhat V Ameny Qemau Hotepibre Iufni Ameny Antef Amenemhet VI Semenkare Nebnuni Sehetepibre Sewadjkare Nedjemibre Khaankhre Sobekhotep Renseneb Hor Sekhemrekhutawy Khabaw Djedkheperew Sebkay Sedjefakare Wegaf Khendjer Imyremeshaw Sehetepkare Intef Seth Meribre Sobekhotep III Neferhotep I Sihathor Sobekhotep IV Merhotepre Sobekhotep Khahotepre Sobekhotep Wahibre Ibiau Merneferre Ay Merhotepre Ini Sankhenre Sewadjtu Mersekhemre Ined Sewadjkare Hori Merkawre Sobekhotep Mershepsesre Ini II Sewahenre Senebmiu Merkheperre Merkare Sewadjare Mentuhotep Seheqenre Sankhptahi XIV Yakbim Sekhaenre Yaammu Nubwoserre Qareh Khawoserre Ammu Ahotepre Maaibre Sheshi Nehesy Khakherewre Nebefawre Sehebre Merdjefare Sewadjkare III Nebdjefare Nebsenre Sekheperenre Bebnum Apepi Nuya Wazad Sheneh Shenshek Khamure Yakareb YaqubHar XV Sharek Semqen AperAnati Salitis SakirHar Khyan Yanassi Apepi Khamudi XVI Djehuti Sobekhotep VIII Neferhotep III Mentuhotepi Nebiryraw I Nebiriau II Semenre Bebiankh Sekhemre Shedwast Dedumose I Dedumose II Montuemsaf Merankhre Mentuhotep Senusret IV Pepi III Abydos Senebkay Wepwawetemsaf Pantjeny Snaaib XVII Rahotep Nebmaatre Sobekemsaf I Sobekemsaf II SekhemreWepmaat Intef Nubkheperre Intef SekhemreHeruhirmaat Intef Senakhtenre Ahmose Seqenenre Tao Kamose New Kingdom and Third Intermediate Period 1550664 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain New Kingdom 15501070 BC XVIII Ahmose I Amenhotep I Thutmose I Thutmose II Hatshepsut Thutmose III Amenhotep II Thutmose IV Amenhotep III Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb XIX Ramesses I Seti I Ramesses II Merneptah Amenmesses Seti II Siptah Twosret XX Setnakhte Ramesses III Ramesses IV Ramesses V Ramesses VI Ramesses VII Ramesses VIII Ramesses IX Ramesses X Ramesses XI 
3 rd Intermediate 1069664 BC XXI Smendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II High Priests of Amun Herihor Piankh Pinedjem I Masaharta Djedkhonsuefankh Menkheperre Smendes II Pinedjem II Psusennes III XXII Shoshenq I Osorkon I Shoshenq II Tutkheperre Shoshenq Takelot I Osorkon II Shoshenq III Shoshenq IV Pami Shoshenq V Pedubast II Osorkon IV XXIII Harsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Iuput I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Shoshenq VII Menkheperre Ini XXIV Tefnakht Bakenranef XXV Piye Shebitku Shabaka Taharqa Tanutamun Late Period and Hellenistic Period 66430 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Late 664332 BC XXVI Ammeris Tefnakht II Nekauba Necho I Psamtik I Necho II Psamtik II Wahibre Ahmose II Psamtik III XXVII Cambyses II Petubastis III Darius I Psammetichus IV Xerxes Artaxerxes I Darius II XXVIII Amyrtaeus XXIX Nepherites I Hakor Psammuthes Nepherites II Muthis XXX Nectanebo I Teos Nectanebo II XXXI Artaxerxes III Khabash Arses Darius III Hellenistic 33230 BC Argead Alexander the Great Philip III Arrhidaeus Alexander IV Ptolemaic Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy II Philadelphus Arsinoe II Ptolemy III Euergetes Berenice II Euergetes Ptolemy IV Philopator Arsinoe III Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra Ptolemy VI Philometor Cleopatra II Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Ptolemy VIII Euergetes Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Soter Cleopatra IV Ptolemy X Alexander I Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander II Ptolemy XII Neos Dionysos Cleopatra V Berenice IV Epiphaneia Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator Arsinoe IV Ptolemy XIV Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Roman Period 30 BC313 AD Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Roman 30 BC313 AD XXXIV Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Lucius Verus Marcus Aurelius Commodus Pertinax Pescennius Niger Septimius Severus Geta Caracalla Macrinus Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Maximinus Thrax Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip Decius Trebonianus Gallus Aemilianus Valerian Macrianus Minor Quietus Lucius Mussius Aemilianus Gallienus Claudius Gothicus Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Diocletian Maximian Galerius Maximinus Daza Dynastic genealogies 
1 st 
2 nd 
3 rd 
4 th 
11 th 
12 th 
18 th 
19 th 
20 th 
21 st to 
23 rd 
24 th 
25 th 
26 th 
27 th 
30 th 
31 st Argead Ptolemaic List of pharaohs Portals Ancient Rome Biography Roman Empire Spain Authority control databases International FAST ISNI VIAF 2 3 4 WorldCat National Norway Chile 2 Spain France BnF data Catalonia Germany Italy Israel Belgium United States Sweden Japan Czech Republic Australia Greece Croatia Netherlands Poland Vatican Artists Te Papa New Zealand ULAN People Deutsche Biographie Structurae Other RISM IdRef Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleHadrianoldid1222241804 Categories Hadrian 76 births 138 deaths 
1 stcentury Romans 
2 ndcentury Roman emperors 
2 ndcentury Roman governors of Syria Adult adoptees Aelii Ancient Roman adoptees Ancient Roman military personnel Ancient Roman poets Bar Kokhba revolt Burials at the Castel SantAngelo Deified Roman emperors Eponymous archons Ghostwriters Imperial Roman praetors LGBT Roman emperors People from Seville comarca Romans from Hispania Roman governors of Pannonia Inferior Roman governors of Syria Roman legates Roman pharaohs Ancient Roman philhellenes Roman quaestors Tribunes of the plebs Hidden categories Webarchive template wayback links Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Good articles Use dmy dates from January 2024 Use British English from July 2019 Articles containing Latinlanguage text Pages with Latin IPA Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images Commons link from Wikidata Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with WorldCat Entities identifiers Articles with BIBSYS identifiers Articles with BNC identifiers Articles with BNE identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with CANTICN identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with ICCU identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with KBR identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with Libris identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NLA identifiers Articles with NLG identifiers Articles with NSK identifiers Articles with NTA identifiers Articles with PLWABN identifiers Articles with VcBA identifiers Articles with TePapa identifiers Articles with ULAN identifiers Articles with DTBIO identifiers Articles with Structurae person identifiers Articles with RISM identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers This page was last edited on 4 May 2024 at 1944 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width